Compared to this time last year, the real estate inventory level in Landen Meadows is HIGHER as of April 2011.
On April 20th and 21st of 2001, the students of Laconia Christian School put on entertaining and emotional performances of “Fiddler on the Roof.” This play featured Ian Jameson as “Tevye,” Natalie Robinson as “Golde,” Nicole Behan as “Tzeitel,” Sarah Hormell as “Hodel,” Cassy Howley as “Chava,” Kimmy Simpson as “Shprintze,” Sarah Hatfield as “Bielke,” Susie Simpson as “Yente, the Matchmaker,” Paul Johnson as “Motel the Tailor,” and many more. Over 60 students acted in this play along with a couple of dozen students and parents getting involved in the backstage and set building. It was another successful event for the school.
The 10th chapter of Hebrews is a chapter with a plea for the Christian to remain steadfast in the faith, to draw near. Paul has prepared the Christian a salad in which he uses a lot of “let us”. In verse 22 he says, “Let us draw near with a true heart,” in verse 23, “let us hold fast the profession of our faith,” and in verse 24, “let us consider one another.” This salad is a part of the Christian’s diet. Digest this “let us” every week and you’ll draw near, you’ll not draw back.
Yauch was diagnosed with cancer in 2009, resulting in a canceled tour and the delay of their album Hot Sauce Committee. The Beastie Boys were inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame last month.
"Adam, the first man in the Bible."
If you can wrap your brain around the idea that two sides of my brain can be friends, you will understand. Both sides of your brain are important and work together to create the unique and wonderful you! Each side has it’s own unique function, but they need one another in order to be whole. I like the idea of being friends with myself.
After a couple days in Nashville to visit Eric's parents, we finally returned to our little home. We set aside 2 days to be our Christmas Eve & Christmas. I was so happy when we got 3 inches of snow on our Christmas day =)
What better way to place a thin black frame
It is into this environment that a large earthquake, tsunami and volcano are thrown, and well, what’s a politician to do? Hype it to the rafters and then wait for the avalanche of aid cash to fill their pockets. The Jakarta Post carries a front-page headline today (Monday), “Foreign aid welcome for reconstruction.” Curiously, I can’t find a link to the story online, but my first reaction is, “Of course it is!”
Can I move my car seat to the front? Mommy let's me..
Then it came time for bed.
The Internet is fraught with worried liars seeking to confuse and mislead independent thinkers. Their motive is clear — scatter decoys and throw people off the path of discovery. They want to obscure the real news, knowing that truth has a flavor.
My cousin had never seen my birth video, so we watched it. I've seen it sooo many times before, but never before have I noticed . . .
Often overshadowed by the high-profile collapse of another federally backed solar company, Solyndra LLC, Beacon Power also went bankrupt last year. But unlike Solyndra, which failed to find a buyer, Beacon Power announced last month that it had been acquired by a private equity firm.
1t. onion powder
Roommates who walked in by accident and were very confused: 1
For my card I have used Sweet November Shroom, a sentiment from Amy R's Be Happy Sentiments and the Mushroom Border Die. I used white card for the mushroom border, then coloured it with the same Copics I used on my image, and of course, for once, I chose my DPs before colouring (which helped...). The DPs are by Toga (saveurs d'automne), I thought it would be nice to have Shroom look at a bird:-)
I can tell by the tense of your lips
My name is Virgil Kane and I served on the Danville Train…
Yes! Those were my exact thoughts precisely 7 weeks ago. I woke up one Tuesday morning and saw some pinkish discharge and wondered if it was the bloody show that I had been told about in the birthing class. I then sat down with my copy of “What to expect when you are expecting” and read to see if my suspicion was true. It was 7.45 am – I woke up my husband and we both decided it was best to call my doctor and seek an appointment, so at 8 am I called and got an appointment for 10.45 that morning. My husband decided to head to work and come back to take me for my appointment later that morning. I decided to stay put and lay in bed.
Save $1.00 when you buy TWO PACKAGES any variety Pillsbury Refrigerated Cookie Dough.
They call the machine Arnie, and have given him a touchscreen interface, temperature awareness and a Soundtube speaker.
(4) there is evidence of white and grey matter abnormalities in the brain;
Naturally, all of us want to help our kids, all of us want to keep our kids safe. But only recently has “good parenting” become synonymous with “constant hovering.” Why do we think kids suddenly need that? Our children are just as competent as we were. If we could organize a kickball game, they can organize a kickball game. If we could walk to school, they can walk to school. And though it feels very hard to believe, our kids are just as safe as we were, too. Safer, actually, if you grew up in the ’70s or ’80s. Crime was going up during those years and it peaked in about 1993. Since then it has been plummeting — and not because we’re keeping kids inside. ALL VIOLENT CRIME is down in the States — including against adults. It is just a safer country, crime-wise, than it was when we were growing up.
Learn Your rules
Come to learn about educational opportunities in our Nation's service academies! Representatives from every branch of the U.S. military will be available to discuss and answer your questions concerning enrollment, eligibility, and the academic requirements for admission.
It’s comfy, it’s sexy, exciting, it’s new
Lelyveld relies on these letters to write the story of the Gandhi-Kallenbach relationship, which he does with sensitivity. His is not the voice of salacious gossip, in fact he warns against any such reading. He also is at pains to point out that we as a culture might have lost the ability to comprehend rare intimacy between men, which is not of the sexual kind.
* Website updates and maintenance
“A group of youths have attacked a local business and clashed with police officers. We would urge parents in the area to call their children if they are not home yet.
Besides the glass and what Target calls "shatterproof" balls (meaning they were not glass) we have a few very special ornaments.
22 B-2. Human Being and Citizen: Essays on Virtue, Freedom and the Common Good (Chicago: Swallow Press/Ohio University Press, 1975), pp. i-xiii, 1-332. The first printing by the Ohio University Press was in 1985. Sources: Items C-1969(3), C-1964(2), C-1964(3), C-1965(2), C-1966(1), C-1967(2), D-X/17/1969. C-1970(1), C-1964(5), C-1972(1), D-V/15/1971, C-1972(5), C-1973(9), C-1974(6), D-IV/25/1974, C-1969(2), and D-XII/29/1970, below). See, for corrections, Item B-3, below, p. 371.
Pay attention to the pattern of the above advice. It does not proclaim a utopia where you are perfect and so is your partner. The advice is not necessarily easy to follow because true relationships take work. At the same time, it is not dystopian. The opposite sex is not objectified or ridiculed as an enemy you must tame.
+ Thank you all so much for your very kind and encouraging thoughts this week. It seriously means so much to me and I appreciate all of your messages, emails, comments, tweets, and thoughts. I really, really do.
See you all on Monday. It’s been a crazy week so I’m a bit behind on emails and answering comment questions, but I’ll make sure to finish that up this weekend.
Thanks so much for inviting me over to your blog today Barbara! I had fun answering your questions, and totally drove Jeff crazy trying to ‘discuss’ my answers with him!!!
Regardless, JFK said what he needed to say that night in Houston, and his presidency helped to show the country that non-Catholics are not as abnormal as they may have thought (though we are plenty abnormal).
I totally adore when everything works together in harmony. From our remotes to our component cabinet to our media storage and gaming control storage, everything has a specific home and it couldn't be easier to keep things in good order!
Caddis. If past history is anything to go by then we should again see a good 3 month period of caddis emergence which should start March, may be a little earlier or later, you never know.
This Kiss
The president acknowledged that the Democratic leadership in Congress had not signed off on the proposed deal. He said, however, that both he and the leadership “were willing to engage in serious negotiations despite a lot of heat from a lot of interest groups around the country in order to make sure that we actually dealt with this problem.”
I’m just too preoccupied to allow my outside to reflect my inside so that nonbelievers recognize that I rejoice because of the hope that is within me. My joy is obscured by the mounds of clutter. Gratefulness is sucked out of my soul by the vacuum called urgency.
1 native
Police said last week an investigation found pedestrian error was to blame for the car-pedestrian collision.
3. San Diego (As a single adult)
At least six female guards have been fired or forced out for undue familiarity with prisoners since 2007, including Kimberly Hurd, 39, who bore an inmate’s love child; Yolanda Turner-Goodwin, 44, who was photographed hugging and kissing a prisoner; and Kadessha Mulgrav, 34, who allegedly sneaked away for a midnight liaison with cop killer Lee Woods in a shower room.
Robin George, who has spent over two years working on this immense project, commented, ‘This has been a real Labour of LovePower. All the time and talent poured into this mission has been heart-warming, to say the least. We are all honoured to be working with such fabulous musicians for such deserving causes.’
University of California Davis librarians worked with Internet Archive to digitize old sets of state publications. These government documents are in the public domain, are still in demand and have broad interest. The Internet Archive provided grant funding so they were able to partner to digitize more than 1000 volumes:
We will continue to do what we do.
How can I go without saying to my parents that I love and respect them so much ??
Original Post by Me: To all my theist friends who might wish to convert me, read this!
I decided to make my way back into the realm of the 21st century, not because I was having withdrawals and couldn't live without it, but because it was frustrating that every time we wanted to look something up we couldn't. Every time we wanted to check a bank balance or try to make vacation plans or look for ideas to redo the closet, we had to either bug someone else or do it after work. It was inconvenient.
she walked to a car today
tomboys (from Joan Jett to L7), who emulate cock-rock
P.S. That’s MY Lemon Tree!
I called in the horderves for our officer party next week, yum, yum...but for tonight, I'm just gonna enjoy the annual event with my friend, and try not to think of anything else.
One half-marathon down: Manhattan. It was fourteen degrees. The windchill was four degrees and it was sunny with a chance of awesomeness. With spotty winter training slowed down by a lung that's giving me trouble, I had no idea what to expect of this half. My longest run in a while had been my easy five-ish miler on my birthday and though I'd been running five miles regularly, I'd gone on no long runs for this.
and I felt naive in my musical ability. I didn't want to involve
“I’m a simple person, Deputy Weston. Steady and calm. Boring. I don’t offend anyone, and no one gives me trouble. Unless you’re talking about Jose Delgado, who is three weeks late with the last book he checked out.”
There is an Herbal Cleanse that provides internal cleansing & enhances nutrient absorption.
I’ve grown bored of iOS, truthfully iOS 5 has been ultimately the best version as of yet, but still feels as though many things are missing. I hoping Apple will come prepared to ‘wow’ me at WWDC in June. Here are some items I feel are needed in iOS 6 or whatever the next iteration of iOS will be called.
1 pound bittersweet chocolate
The Tea-Serving Doll by Mae Empson
13. Bracket - Betterman
Devin Martin
on the run
I suspected that her inquiry was not entirely serious, but as I happened to have pertinent views on how thespians should approach their craft, I decided to make the most of her invitation.
Left (top to bottom) --
Art Set App
Sent: Monday, April 09, 2012 6:07 PM
Add the tequila, orange liqueur, fruit juices and sweetener in a cocktail shaker half filled with ice cubes. Close it and shake well for about 1 minute.
My only regret was taking a late flight. We decided to fly at 8:50 PM because I didn’t want to miss the kid’s playgroup and class at Kindyroo and because the flight was a bit cheaper. We ended up paying about 1.5 million rupiah per ticket plus 250,00 for Joshua’s. Not bad considering I bought them 3 days before leaving. Anyway, about the late night flight, Joshua was very tired and had a very hard time falling asleep. Every time he heard a noise, he would wake up and start crying very loudly. Thankfully this only happened before we boarded and by the time we were on the plane he was sleeping like a baby.
12 ounces Golden Delicious apples (about 2), peeled, cored, thinly sliced (small chunks)
The waif crouches under the window and lights one of her matches. Just one.
(13) 3 cameras (1 film, 1 point and shoot, 1 Digital SLR)
I was thinking that since I have been very good with my money this pay period I may try and find a sports bar to go and watch the game. But since I fell asleep a while ago I am a little late for that now I guess.
If you're familiar with his work and style, you'll know that this is a recipe for SUCCESS! I'm so stoked, it's got an IMBD page and everything!!!
Colours went all wrong in this pic, they're suppose to be darker than they look here. Microshadow (bubble) and blush (must have) from Make Up Store. I'm really disappointed with the eyeshadow, it's suppose to be light blue but when applying it doesn't look like anything and there isn't really much pigment. This time tried a peachier colour for blush, I always have pink, it's a nice change and I think it looks better now when it's winter.
P.S. Just ignore our crappy BBQ my backyard is rather small so I dont have many places to take pictures and I have to fight with the sun sometimes!
This year’s base funding is $5,634.77 per student. Under the school funding proposal for 2012-13, the base funding would increase to $5,843.26, up about $200 from this year. Student enrollment is expected to increase next year by about 9,000 K-12 students (1.1%), and the growth in at-risk students is expected to be about 3,300 students (1.1%). This means districts will see student enrollment growth, as well as an increase in the number of students who need the most help in school — but they will not get any more money from the state for these increased needs.
One solitary bluebird seems to hangout with nearly fifty finches. I hope they help keep him warm at night.
At first a listener might think he’s regretting being a sloppy and possibly violent husband. But — in one of those wonderful twists you find in country-music classics like Leon Ashley’s “Laura (What’s He Got That I Ain’t Got)” and Willie Nelson’s “I Just Can’t Let You Say Goodbye” — you realize the narrator is holding a gun, and he’s apologizing for the mess he’s about to leave his former Mrs. to clean up.
Still, there will be difficult days ahead. The enormous sacrifices of our men and women are not over. But tonight, I’d like to tell you how we will complete our mission and end the war in Afghanistan.
1/2 tspn saffaron
Draft 2: Oh. My. God. What have I done? What have I done? I have written a huge pile of crap. This can never be a novel Never. What am I going to do? Okay, deep breath. Small steps. Here I go.
Angel Six: “Mathematics. Law of averages. Let a complex system repeat itself long enough eventually something surprising might occur. That too is in God’s plan.”
Positive energy, presently employ.
Well, it’s simple, I can have three litters, ranging in size from four to ten, ready to go every month if I simply acquire six more does and two more bucks. This allows me to give the does a six week period without babies and one full month where their bodies aren’t being eaten up by babies in one form or another. While most of what I’ve read says that this is more than adequate, I’m still slightly worried about the doe’s health in the long run with this schedule and I may end up picking up more does to help ease the strain on them.
- The Greater Sekhukhune district municipality had initially ­refused to sign off on the project as it had questions about the roof’s design, according to a probe by Public Protector Thuli Madonsela;
So, with so many fabulous things going on in my life (finally) I just haven’t felt that great health wise . . . I told this to my friend, Cori Dyer of the Make Life Better Foundation and she suggested I try the Make Life Better Transformation while we were at the Kids Choice Awards in March. I really stewed about that. Do I really have time to do an entire transformation? Was it really even possible?
you see, although i still really like the idea that we came up with for cake and cotton to be a conversation between my favorite red-head (you) and i....i think there may be some that are needing a little motivation to join into the banter.
Last night, I was unable to complete my run due to a later exit from the office and a meet up with a couple of my pals.
The current Lambeth Labour administration may well know more about a clear focus on improving public services (though they could do with applying that focus to Housing…) However, there is a danger that Lambeth’s current Labour Group, in common with their counterparts in Lewisham and Southwark, may be so worried about being identified with the 1980s that they will now ignore the importance of a shared struggle against Tory cuts.
I've been haunted by the story all my life. Can you imagine? Having your home burned down and being told to just leave? "Go away -- you and your whole community are not wanted here"?
These are the first three pages - not complete yet, I may make small additions - of a little fabric book inspired by a poem written by one of my cousins who died recently. The pages are roughly 5 inches square and it will be a concertina book, not opening left to right but waterfall fashion so that the whole poem can be read at once.
And if we don’t renew that, then the $1,000 that’s been going to a typical American family this year as a consequence of the tax cut that I worked with the Republicans and passed in December — that lapses. That could weaken the economy.
Although it іѕ easy tо put the word "sexy" іn front of juѕt abоut any standard costume: (e.g. sexy schoolgirl, sexy fairy etc.) keеp in mind thаt th$26#1110;s formula works оnlу beсausе thеsе types of costumes fulfill а fantasy. The fantasy cоuld bе оf the storybook or fairy tale variety, the thrill of playing "doctor", or possibly the seduction by a "person іn uniform." However, juѕt adding the word sexy to an otherwіsе non-sexy costume cоuld spell disaster (just do a quick Google search on "Sexy Freddy Kruger" аnd уоu'll ѕеe what I mean.)
Green tea mixes with names like Strawberry Fields and one that I love but can never remember the very odd name.
If you're ever in El Paso, this is a little known, often missed gem! The tramway takes 6 people at a time from a the parking lot (elevation: 4,692 feet) up to Ranger Peak (elevation: 5,632 feet) in a little gondola. From the top, you can see almost El Paso, New Mexico and Juares (this is the easier version of a different mountain top where Amir proposed).
Check out all the amazing designs and inspiration:
It's been so long since I've blogged that I've pretty much forgotten where we left off...
Specially if you would be talking to your mother in law. Oh, no! You don't mess with her stuff.
Pier One is one of those stores I try to avoid. They have too many cute things that I want to take home, but they are usually too expensive for my crazy cheap self. I had some time to kill before meeting up with Mr. Delightful and my MIL for dinner plus I had some birthday cash sitting in my wallet so I decided to stop in. While there were many beautiful things, I walked out of the store spending only $11.
Now, the definition I really love:
77. Got a piercing? - Each earlobe.
‘Man in the Browser’ attack
Well thats about it from me. Before I go I just want to thank everyone for their e.mails over the last few weeks. Freddie has been away for 3 weeks so it has been really nice to have a chat from time to time. To you all, you know who you are, I send lots of hugs.
After a warm welcome, introduction of this speaker, and as the applause quieted down, he rose from his high back chair and walked slowly, with great effort and a sliding
Well keep crafting and thanks for listening. Leslie
Not surprisingly, Americans had intervened in the conflict between Iraq and Kuwait with mixed motives. The invasion of Kuwait by Iraq was destabilizing and threatened to place even more oil under the rule of a volatile dictator who might not serve America's interests. Furthermore, it was not certain whether Iraq would stop its advance with Kuwait or continue into Saudi Arabia to capture even more oilfields.
So we're now waiting to see if the client wants to go after her for the improper modification of the deed or if we just let it lie and hope she finally shuts the hell up.
Here are the books I'm thinking about this week (although I'm not actually reading them all). Salt kindly sent me Pictures from Hopper by my fellow Salt author Neil Campbell, his new collection of short stories. The blurb explains that 'it draws upon the work of the American painter Edward Hopper ... bringing to life a mythical America' and conjuring up characters aching with need in locations as diverse as New York and the Isle of Arran.
Take the girl from the country, but not the country from the girl.
AHHH.. its taste is horrible, mainly if it touchs my back part of my tongue ... one of its contents is so sweeeeet, sickening sweety, I couldn't imagine to drink it with honey as it is suggested on the box.... On the very first day, when I tired out this tea, I even shivered with cold as I drank it, I thought that I wouldn't be able to drink 3 mugs from it, and I didn't do that at all, but yesterday, maybe I accustomed to its strange taste, I drank 2 mugs, and today I did 3 mugs!! I am so proud of myself... :))
Recommended for those looking for a sweet, lighthearted workplace romance, with plenty of humor and quirks (hello, robot love interest); bonus for fans of Mizushima Hiro.
Hmm.............time for the bonus points of the year which have been aplenty giving me tonnes of happiness:)
1. Media people prefer emails, not phone calls.
Communities need a reason for existing, and that typically is a shared interest or purpose. Community members generally have a common reason for joining.While some communities may be more general — YouTube, for example, or Facebook — these broader communities generally are hosts for sub-communities comprised, for example, by you and your friends on Facebook, people who like stupid human tricks videos on YouTube,[2] fans of a band on MySpace,[3] or members of your family tree on Ancient Faces.[4]
I decided to combine one of the iconic colors of St. Patrick’s day, gold, with its traditional shape the shamrock, and cut my shamrock from gold Expressions vinyl. I found this great shape with the swirls in the Silhouette online store.
Like this one. Charisma vacuums Katherine Heigl and Gerard Butler combine to losing effect for this charmless comedy black hole. See also: Bride Wars, Marley & Me, Couples Retreat…
I told you it was flat.
A fire kindled, soft the glow
I become interested in his motives.
As you close in on the threshold, you are giving yourself an opportunity to get all of the old stuff out of your system. But in order to get it all out of your system, you have to get it all out on the table in front of your face first. You have to see what’s going on, so that you can see that you can make a difference and make a change. But in order to make that change you have to know what it is you’re changing. And to know what it is you’re changing, you have to see more of what it is you’ve been hiding, under the table.
Maybe that’s just too obvious?
8. You become more responsible, and take on the toughest thing ever: to inspire a sense of responsibility in your team.
Lots of beads coming from the kiln, being made into jewelry for an upcoming show.
Rnd 4) Knit even
I love coffee in the morning; I love that burnt and earthy smell drifting into my peripheries. But I’d much prefer the drift of a younger crowd and a conversation. I dream of the poets and philosophers of Paris and London in the regency coffee shops or Bakunin, Blanc and International Workingmen’s Association.
Exploding on the scene that sweeps
“There’s been a shift towards a 'better safe than sorry’ approach towards those working or involved with children that isn’t based on logic,” says Helene Guldberg, Open University psychologist and author of Reclaiming Childhood: Freedom and Play in an Age of Fear. “We have absurd situations where you can’t take photographs of your own child in public places, or a man isn’t allowed to sit beside an unaccompanied child on an aircraft, and this assumption of guilt, of sinister motivation, is really corrosive to society.”
1tsp chili powder
I'd be happy to read your response with greater depth, if you would be so kind as to follow my VERY FUCKING SIMPLE REQUEST #1, in my prior letter to you, titled Paragraphs and Reasoning
Roy gets home to the hotel he's living at and tells the owner that Mrs. Langtry may be stopping by. Roy empties his pockets of the money he made and practices tossing a coin. He hallucinates his old mentor, Mintz (Eddie Jones) in his room asking "What do you want, kid?" and then remembers a past meeting. He approaches Mintz, wanting to learn from him. Impressed that Roy figured out a card trick he offers to show him a few things. He confronts Mintz.
"You'll be okay" I whisper into her ear, reassuring both of us in that moment.
1 feature per week.
Feast Day: September 23
My correction of this tip is to just try on shoes in various sizes. Every shoe and foot is different. Try your normal size plus a size up and a size down. Walk around the store at your normal speed to get a a good feel for how each pair feels on your feet, and buy the size that fits you best and is the most comfortable. Frankly, if shoes cause you a lot of pain, I advicate against buying them. Shoes should be pretty and comfortable, or at least not unbearably painful. I wholeheartedly agree with the last sentence of that tip though.
Bake the brownies about 25 minutes, until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out almost clean with a few moist crumbs attached to it. Let the brownies cool directly in the pan on a baking rack, then use the foil overhang to lift the brownies out. You can cut these into whatever size you like, but I suggest doing three lengthwise cuts, then three crosswise cuts to make 16 brownies. If you have the self-control to not gobble up these freshly baked brownies immediately, these can be made 2 days ahead if stored in an airtight container at room temperature.
Who needs plans when you can have surprises?
What issuing these coins does do is remove the legal need for the debt ceiling to be raised, and also reduce the amount of outstanding Treasury securities, which is what is called govt debt. So while both reserves and Treasury securities are, functionally, govt liabilities and differ in name (and sometimes duration) only, the headline rhetoric does make that distinction. So technically, this process eliminates the ‘national debt’ and removes any (misguided) notion of solvency risk. The idea just started to get serious traction the last few days as the debt stalemate has grown more intense and partisan. Yale constitutional law professor Jack Balkin floated it as an option in a CNN op-ed yesterday (July 28th).
3. Bake until a toothpick is inserted and comes out clean, about one hour and 15 minutes. Let cool on wire rack for 10 minutes. Then pop bread out of pan and let it cool completely. Enjoy!
“When you boil it all down, the CDF’s complaints are trumped up, giving the U.S. bishops the excuse to act against a relatively independent Catholic voice that they don’t like—and a warning to others (perhaps such as Sister Carol Keehan of the Catholic Health Association) not to offer an alternative Catholic voice in the national debate. Sister Simone Campbell of NETWORK said it best, I think: ‘I think we scare them.’ ”
We have already seen the disproportionate number of young black men who are involved in knife crime , and the fact we actually have a separate police force Operation Trident dedicated entirely to dealing with gun crime in the black community, even the most argent of multiculturalists, it they are honest, has to accept that there is an issue here.
The boos increase. Da Infamous DiZ never rids himself of his stupid grin and winks at the beauty in the ring. She waves back, attracted to the new champion as her slight blush displays but not starstruck like the women on his arms. As they reach the ring the ladies get off of his arms and he enters the ring. He steps in and kisses the announcer on the cheek. She whispers something in his ear and walks out, next to the women Da Infamous DiZ came out with. They exchange grins that disguise hateful feelings of jealousy. Maybe this is in the DiZ’s mind. He doesn’t worry about it. He takes off his belt and holds it up as a lackey from the outside hands him a mic.
Kevin Parent
The book has been hand-typed from one of the few existing copies and digitally reproduced by the extraordinary Jarett Kobek. http://kobek.com/
So onto today's workshop.The lovely Sue arrived with a card for me. I was decidedly nervous, and rightly so...
1. Preheat oven to 160C
And more than anything, I was thankful that the road had brought so many of us back together for but a few short hours.
Look at my little gray cylinder. I made two little mistakes and I want to fix them with my colorless blender. If you make a mistake and go outside the lines with dark colors there are a lot of dye particles that you need to push back into your image.
At this writing we do not know who Romney’s vice presidential choice will be, but I can guarantee you that it will not be Sarah Palin, Michelle Bachmann, or Condoleeza Rice. A woman on the ticket has been tried and it was no help at all. Sorry ladies. If anything, Palin demonstrated she had more grit than McCain in the last election.
It took a while to make my flower, but in the end took less time than deciding on the background - why is that so often the case? Probably because I rarely plan what I'm going to do before getting stuck in. I feel this is also the reason that after making something like this my desk always looks lie someone emptied the contents of every shelf and drawer on to it - which, to be fair, I did!
So a nice fellow from Britain sends me an e-mail today asking me if I'd be interested in buying some vintage bottles of beer from him. I'm assuming they're not still drinkable — I think the idea is to set them on the shelves and have your friends ooh and aah over them. Check out the pictures. I'd gladly do it if I had more disposable income, but given the financial wrestling I've had to do lately, I think I'd be better off spending my cash on beer I can actually drink. However, maybe I can tempt one of you with his offer.
These were just a small few of the many classes offered at the MAHSC. The program is designed for professionals, but is open to everyone and is held each year at the end of January or in early February. If you would like to consider attending next year, like MAHSC on Facebook for updates.
The truth is that we just don't know--not only because most of the data is self-reported, but because no one has really correlated it, or surveyed the self-pub industry as a whole.
It's very much my opinion that women are often toxic towards other women in all walks of life, and it's something I work very hard on myself as I will admit that, as I've got a fairly unique territory, my knee jerk reaction is often to jealously guard it - which I then stop myself doing unless it's justified.
“Is he better?”
I'm still thinking about Cub alot. I always called Cub "he". I don't know if it was just because Jacob is a boy and I was used to saying "he" or if I somehow knew that Cub was a boy.
You can actively create the life you want too! You can start by simply writing your own personal affirmations!
The more experience and knowledge you have in a specific subject, the more reliable your intuition will become.
Not forgiving someone prevents you from having a fulfilling relationship with them. You might feel like you are getting them back by not forgiving but you are only hurting yourself. For the Christian, forgiveness is expected. Christ said we are to love our enemies and forgive those who mistreat us. We are to forgive someone not seven times but seventy-seven times.
The new blog roll is broken up into categories:
But is this a French floozy? RateBeer has it brewed by Lindenbrauerei Unna, BeerPal has it amusingly brewed by Meantime London? Who really cares? It is a little 25cl stubby of cheap lout with a French name. That’s French enough for me.
Where is the knowledge we have lost by not having knowledge cafes. I made that one up. To put it simply David Gurteen has struck upon the most fundamental of concepts, the benefits of putting people together randomly to elicit conversation. The number of participants, quantity of business cards exchanged and overall level of smiliness were indicators of another hugely successful event. I had a great time, meeting new people, learning new things and making sense of my own thoughts, Thanks again David.
Ride on the right
Each one of us has a unique brain “program” or virtual reality system that accounts for why some people “see” and some don’t. But the operating system must be the same for there are accounts to numerous to list of hauntings and ghosts. I for one have seen and heard and experienced enough to make me a believer while letting the skeptic in me do the research and evidence review.
Now I'm supposed to tag 5 other people so these are the people whose answers I'd really like to read:
The ride was interesting. I actually enjoyed it. You get to appreciate the view of the side street more because Bajaj goes much slower than cars. You hear this engine noise loud in the seat and you’re exposed to the exhaustion of cars, but as you can see in my pictures, there were not many cars, so it didn’t bother me.
Rumors of fatalities and we have no idea
On February 16, Matthew Glans, the Midwest Director of The Heartland Institute’s Center on Finance, Insurance, and Real Estate, posted a commentary on its “Somewhat Reasonable” blog, “Media Biggest Proponent for BPA Ban.” My research files are filled with hundreds of examples of this and one need only Google “BPA” to find thousands of references to the chemical with the single theme of banning it.
2010.08.24 Iraq Fallujah 2 2 Two children are successfully killed by Mujahideen bombers in a blast that also leaves their mother wounded.
Once when meeting with a parent about their child’s behavior, the father sat up and loudly said, “We’ve done every thing we know to do. We’ve taken things away from her. We’ve spanked her. Why we even grounded her and the groundation didn’t work.”
chosen successor, Solomon (1 Kings 1:7).
Vancouver 2.5 maximum, discretionary exemptions and incentive bonuses can lead to greater development. Note this city has the highest density of residential occupancy in north America, higher than Manhatten[10]. A push towards higher densities in single family zoned areas through an ‘ecodensity’ programme was highly controversial. High residential land prices in the core has led to some businesses being forced out of downtown.
#4 Are you confused as to what lies ahead of you?
What does bliss feel like to you?
Devon wins the match with a Spinebuster, to retain his title.
But until then, I have this photo to remind me of what winter once looked like.
They wanted me to heat up a dish. Fine, I did.
This is just a small handful of the MANY silly poses she chose to put on for me that afternoon! She seriously cracks me up! She insisted on a couple of poses with the scarecrows, too. One where she was pretending to dance with one of them, and another holding its 'hand' ...LOL!
The government, meanwhile, stands by its nominations.
Anyway, the move was pretty quick and simple with no injuries or catastrophes and then we helped Julie return her Budget rental truck to some warehouse ghetto area. We then went on a hunt for pizza and after avoiding some sketchy places we settled on Pizzeria Uno where a server dropped his drink tray and gave us minor splishy splashy. After paying for the overpriced fake deep dish pizza, we were offered apples on the way out. Odd.
Wing it Wednesdays- I’ll find a topic that I feel like talking about, whether it’s what I’m working on at the moment, something I’m inspired by- etc.
Many often mourn on this day, but it is not accurate to mourn the majority of the lives on this day. Titanic hit the iceberg around 11:40pm on April 14th, but did not finally sink until just after 2am on April 15th. This means the main day of mourning should be tomorrow.
unbearable for people of various ethnic groups as a way to deter
Mix the refined oatmeal and cereal with the wheat germ, the two flours, baking soda, salt and cinnamon.
So in a game where they were substantially ahead, his coach put him in. He made his baskets, the crowds went wild. So from then on "team had a new goal of getting so far ahead of the other team, that David would have an opportunity to play some minutes.”
My goal for 2011 was to look after myself and stay mentally and physically well. I knew that I would have to ask for help to do that. I achieved this. I am fitter than I have been in a long time. I prioritised exercise, I ate lunch most days and I had some time out. Found time to do things that fill my tank such as making things.
And now, we have options. And more than likely over the course of the next few months, I'll start talking about what those are for us. In the mean time, my job is to investigate them and see which ones would realistically work for us as a family. And options are good, for in the very least I will have loads of big brown boxes to open somewhere, be it in Derby, Berlin, or somewhere in between.
[UPDATE001] In the comments Witterings from Witney draws the parallel between our PM and 'cast-iron' Cameron. Even without knowing much about Dutch politics. It is an apt parallel. One I referred to in the grey, far-away past of this modest blog. Both Cameron and Rutte are politicians of the europlastic variety, playing one tune to the home audience, while whistling Beethovens Ninth to the 'colleagues'. So perhaps I shouldn't get worked up about this. It is to be expected from the likes of Rutte. But I can't help it. There were promises made, oaths taken. And they were callously broken as soon as the opportunity presented itself. And it is a sign of the despicably rotten state of our so-called democracy, that the majority of the Dutch just shrug it off as just another case of everyday politics. IT ISN'T SUPPOSED TO BE THIS WAY!
Not yet anyway!
Which is good. Because being a farmer? It's kind of exhausting.
.NET Highly desired 5 Years 2 – Proficient
Anne has also created gorgeously hand made necklaces incorporating gemstones, which balance energies in the body, linen waxed cords, charms she has found while traveling, and personally designed bronze or sterling clasps.
#2 Singles: Conner Sexton defeated Macklin Robbins (6-0) (6-2)
Then again, the danger in not having a plan is that I could end up writing the same novel for years and never get to the ending, or worse, the climax, so I do have to be careful.
As well as criticism, the new secondary plan drew praise from some delegations. “It is not perfect, but we find it measured, respectful and grounded in reality,” said Marty Williams, executive director of the Downtown Guelph Business Association.
These seven planes correspond to the seven states of consciousness in man. It remains with him to attune the three higher states in himself to the three higher planes in Kosmos. But before he can attempt to attune, he must awaken the three “seats” to life and activity. And how many are capable of bringing themselves to even a superficial comprehension of Atma-Vidya (Spirit-Knowledge), or what is called by the Sufis, Rohanee! In Section the VIIth of this Book, in Sub-section 3,
Although this quote is too long, I think, for most people to memorize and spout off, it is definitely memorable.
A new study published in Sleep Journal shows that sleeping more each night can dampen the effects of weight-gaining genes. The study was conducted at the University of Washington, in Seattle and looked at the weight and sleeping habits of 1,088 pairs of twins in the University of Washington Twin Registry. The research team found that those who got less sleep — less than 7 hours a night — were not only heavier, but also had less control over their weight than those who got more than 9 hours of shuteye.
Heat olive oil, pan fry salmon for 1-2 mins each side, not to over-cooked the fish. Set aside.
Thanks to everyone tuning into this blog series on diversity. I wanted to share with you the winner, by random number generator, of Danette's beautiful book is Christy Farley! Congrats Christy!!
If stress urinary incontinence is more likely to arise from a planned vaginal delivery than from a planned caesarean section, then the costs of dealing with this complication increase the cost of the former – to a point at which, while the cost differential is not eliminated or reversed, it is dramatically reduced. Taking this downstream cost into account, planned vaginal delivery has a total cost of £3,275, compared with £3,359 for planned caesarean section, and the additional cost of an increase in the rate of planned caesarean sections from 10% to 11% would be c.£0.5 million.
Springtime in Provence is heavenly... and it is quite possibly my favourite season. Although I do say that about every season... My friend Kit of the lovely blog Chic Provence is arranging another tour to Provence this spring... it sounds wonderful and the itinerary reads like the perfect way to spend time in Provence...
Monferno is the middle child of the Sinnoh Fire starter. Like Combusken before it, it gains the Fighting subtype. It evolved from Chimchar at level 14, and learns Mach Punch as its first Fighting move.
The existing large Taxus, Yew, shrubs are preserved. A buffer of perennials is created around the trunk of each Quercus, Oak, tree.
I think it might be this kind of day...
And touch not the wall,
From the book you’re currently reading, or one you just finished, tell us what made you SWOON. What got your heart pounding, your skin tingling, and your stomach fluttering. Shout it out on Twitter with the hashtag #YABound, post it here in the comments, or grab the adorable button above and share it on your blog! We want to know :-)
Stand in the desert. Near them on the sand,
1 cup of milk
Carolyn, I will be shipping him out Saturday morning, please email me your mailing address, jenn_martino@yahoo.com!
I think I am going to have a problem. I have never
Please note - you want to mash the potato until smooth but DO NOT add milk or butter to it. You want just one medium sized, floury potato which has been mashed.
I wasn't a doula yet, but Mimi didn't know that. When I got up that day, labor had begun. She followed me everywhere, preferring to be stepped on to being alone. I figured these things would naturally take their course and went about my day--out of the house from 10 until 4, and dinner with friends. I knew she was still contracting, but I had no idea that she was waiting. At ll p.m., I sat down to watch TV. She laid down in front of me. With the first contraction, I SAW A SPLASH!!! We moved her to the place we had prepared (in the closet, like the Bible says...). In moments, there was another cat in the house.
I Dug IN and I Dug It and I can't wait to do it again next year!
This book was good at balancing how she finds out about “the mystery”, while choosing between Russell and Reed, and making friends while being a freshman in college. Normally in ya fiction, it’s just about the girl ditching everyone she knows for the sake of her new boyfriend, but the author was able to help keep her character connected to her new friends while building the story.
Wow, put down the torches.
none other than just a poor poor repeat
and you realize...
Which leaves us with a final riddle: what on earth would induce the Managing Partner of a Royal firm of solicitors to mislead a company (that had hacked his own client) into thinking that it was corporately innocent?
Our glasses met, our lips met after.
The extra egg mix that's going to be left (unless you really soaked the bread) has a lot of potential. Take what's left and put it into the pan you just used for the french toast on low heat. They are going to cook really fast so watch them and keep stirring them.
Well, hell, at least, you have a good friend to commiserate and wallow in shared La La Land misfortune with, right? Actually, she's your best friend, your oasis of sanity, your port in the storm, the only person you really feel you know in this crazy town. You met her on — oh, what was it, was it that audition for Real World Huntington Beach? Was it that one NBC pilot? Well, anyway, you've known her for a good portion of your time in town, and truth be told, you sort of bask in her glow every time you're around her — she's that vibrant, that talented, that comforting. That sexy.
I walk into the room and adjust the toco and viola! Contractions. Slightly spaced out but not enough that I am concerned. I had to do this at least twice more during the course of the labor since apparently Nurse Crappy isn't capable of performing this task. I try so hard to be patient and nice to her, but dayum, she makes it hard!
Honestly, I don't use metallics much so this really was a challenge. Especially since I wasn't even sure if I had any metallic CS in my stash. Glitter paper, sure! But metallic? I was fortunate enough to find 2 pieces of brushed silver to work with, though!
I'm well aware that his is not going to be the universal response to this galette. It is brash and bold, fresh and tart. The flavors are strong, but quite balanced. The cranberries are straight-out bitter/tart. The apples add the sweet note, the dried cherries amp up the flavor, and the jam combines with the lime and the ginger and the sugar to make a vivid, sweet glaze. The whipped cream (I used unsweetened) was a perfect accompaniment to the galette; it performed the welcome job of mellowing the flavors.
I understand it is tradition to adopt the family name of the husband. You pass it off to your children, and you live as one happy same named family.
Not only do authors continue to send me their stories, but ex-employees who finally see the true thievery of the operation also continue to contact me. Over the past two years, I have had calls and letters from six former employees. And now, I have been contacted by two more.
Because I could name a thousand–maybe a million–successful female artists. That didn’t have to hide the fact they are women. Right now (excuse any misspellings): Celine Dion, Cher, Madonna, Carrie Underwood, Dolly Parton, Sheryl Crow, Bonnie Rait, Sarah McLachlan, Adele, Blondie, Brandy, Jennifer Lopez, Mylie Cyrus, Mariah Carrey, Tracy Chapman, Ferron, Melissa Etheridge, Peaches, Fiona Apple, Gwen Stafani, Miranda Lambert, Nelly Fertado, Macy Grey, Missy Elliot, Queen Latifah, Faith Hill, Janet Jackson, Jewel, Lesley Gore, Joan Jett, Lady Gaga, TLC, Reba McEntire, Anne Murray, Alanis Morrisette, Pink, Katy Perry, Robyn, Tina Turner, Brittany Speares, Shania Twain, Aretha Franklin, Judy Garland, on and on and on.
The Cook, The Thief, His Wife & Her Lover (Kees Kasander, producer)
also.
1 – Avengers Assemble – (NE) – £15.778.074
I pushed him, trying to get my legs between us. “Get off of me!”
SO for the last year or so only 2 out of 4 burners have worked on the stove. I am resourceful. 2 is better than zero, so it has not bothered me. The wife feels differently. She likes to fix sh!t. I don't like to like to fix things, I like to ignore broken things, make pigs, drink coffee, try another variation on pizza recipes, like that.
Due to our holidays, we had to celebrate my Mom's birthday earlier. I thought I was prepared but I was wrong. With the trip co-ordination and DD unwell, I was not in a good condition and took things for granted, thinking that my pantry had all the stuff I need.
"When you become a man and build a house," said the mother bunny,
Preparing the Cake
President Obama, the Pentagon and U.S. National Security State has embraced the idea of the ‘long war’– a twenty-year strategy envisioning deployment of U.S. troops in dozens of countries, and the Army adopted the idea of “the era of persistent warfare.”[6]
Another thing I wanted to say is that I’m so happy with the support from the friends I told about my secret, although I still haven;t had the guts to show my fiancée (I’m working on it though), but she’s still supporting me. Anyway, in a couple of weeks my parents are going holiday, and with my brothers gone I’ll be free to be Mel nearly all day every day (I’ve managed to get that week off work) and I’m planning a girly night in with those aforementioned friends, who’ve agreed to show me how to do makeup and such. Depending on how brave I’m feeling, we might even venture into town, that’s a BIG if though.
The President did cancel a couple of fundraisers yesterday, and that was probably reasonable and appropriate, given the ongoing crisis. It wouldn't look particularly good for the President to be raising money from fat cats at a time when he is seemingly making tough decisions on the budget and the deficit with Congressional Republicans and when the nation is facing a legitimate crisis.
Written by Angela Shelf Medearis. Illustrated by Daniel Minter. Ages 4-8.
6) Sam Adams Cranberry Lambic aka Cough Syrup
Wells enjoyed some marginal success in Pittsburgh. He spent parts of five seasons with the club, while lowering his ERA. After the Pirates, Kip bounced around the major and minor leagues. Wells signed a minor league deal with the Chicago White Sox in April 2012, only to mutually agree to part ways after ten days.
Anyways, the new carpet and flooring is now down and looking all new and fresh, it was a nightmare of a task and I would like to point out to anyone crazy enough to do such a thing to think ahead as to where they are going to put all their furniture and belongings whilst this mammoth task goes ahead!! We have a basement... so Chris and I boxed everything that was lose and moved all the smaller bits of furniture (and some bigger bits) down there... but yes, we were having the basement re-carpetted too but I told the guys that they would have to do the top two floors first and then do the basement carpet on the last day once we had a chance to put things back into the 'done' areas. See, good planning eh? ;) Hmmmm, end of day one they had completed the carpets in the bedrooms and lounge and part of the stairs and tell me they are doing the basement next!! Just to compound the problem... it was the warmest day of the year here in Calgary... a lovely bright sunny/hot 27 degrees C!! I have never moved so many boxes in such a short space of time in my life... and people that know this blog know that I am pretty good around boxes... have had plenty of practice!!
But do you know what is more interesting than thinking?
writing during the less hectic days of saturday of sunday is sometimes necessary. The demands of being a parent, a stressful job or even a lifestyle that does not allow a daily writing routine.
Grid
Each Shine set contains 3 lanterns. The pop-out cards are size 31 cm x 15 cm. The lanterns are large enough to fit over most drinking glasses and jam jars. Recommended retail price per set: EUR 7.95
He has had many visitors over the last few days. So thanks and hugs go out to Brian, Don & Alice, Kent & Katie, Mike & Heather, Ashley & Ryan, Mike U. I hope I haven't missed anyone. Also thanks to Tom & Sean N. for coming to see Sean at mom's house before the move back to St. Louis. Thank you to Jess for getting us a mitt for Sean. Although, they tell us we cannot use it as it is considered a restraint...UGH! The visitors and love and support are so good for Sean and us all. Our hearts are full...
The Spirit of Modern Republicanism Thomas L. Pangle
I got up early this morning to catch an early train out of town for work. I am exhausted now. It's going to be an early night for me! Miss M seems to have enough energy for both of us, though. Thankfully daddy is here to pick up the slack.
Folks, I am here to talk to you today about a movie so bizarre and so out of this world that it is its own genre entirely. I am here not just to criticize this bizarre little freakshow of a movie, but to try and explain it, and figure out how we as a society are to look at it as a work of a---okay, seriously, it’s a goddamn movie about a psychic tire who falls in love with a woman and blows peoples’ heads up. It’s really not that big of a deal.
Perhaps it was inevitable that Murakami explored what happened within the Sakigake compound. In the same way that Murakami wrote "The Place That Was Promised", the second part of the nonfiction Underground, because he felt the necessity to give voices to the members of the Aum Shinrikyo cult, the novelist must have planned to provide a fictive parallel to the cult psychology before it branched out into the cult's terrorist act, the release of deadly sarin gas in Tokyo subway trains.
Jenn's listed a few blog starter questions for those who need or want suggestions, and they look good to me, especially since I feel a bit rusty! So first off, HOW DID YOU SPEND THANKSGIVING? We really didn't know for sure where we'd be for dinner until a few days before, and that turned out to be at home! My mom had hip replacement surgery a few weeks ago (one of the reasons A Sea of Books has been idle lately), but she's getting around pretty well now, so we picked her up and brought her over -- literally, Grandmother's house is over the bridge and through the woods. Fortunately, she brought a turkey with her! My sister and I managed all the trimmings. So, it was a kind of low key day, just my sister and her kids, E-Girl-8 and J-Boy-11, my mom, and me. We kept things simple so there was no stress - except E-Girl-8 was very upset when she realized there would be no chocolate cream pie (can't say as I blame her!) but of course we had pumpkin (umm!).
§ I have rejoiced in the way of Thy testimonies, As much as in all riches.
What effects could a more conservative Egypt have on Tunisia? They are twofold:
Yesterday, I introduced the proposed "Ohio for Ohioans" Amendment to the Ohio Constitution to provide a means to effectively enforce nullification of federal statutes in violation of the U.S. Constitution and state statutes in violation of the U.S. and Ohio Constitutions.
When I was 13, when I was 16, I would have hated the idea of my parents deciding my entertainment. It was my entertainment, my choice, I was an individual with my own ideas, would have hated to be associated with children's entertainment, wanted to be a grown-up.
18And the Lord has made it clear this day that you are a special people to him, as he gave you his word; and that you are to keep all his orders;
Several months ago, a friend of mine asked whatever happened to that paranormal historical that finaled in the Brava contest a year ago.
So I still watch sometimes. I cover my eyes when Alan’s on the screen because he’s … gross and sad. But I like Walden and Zoey (said British girlfriend as played by Sophie Winkelman).
So, like I said. It's a bitter pill. I can't seem to choke it down. Maybe getting it out of my head will help my heart start to heal.
We’re diametrically opposed to using backing tracks live, so yes, the live show has different energy, and a different chemistry. Some of the overdubs will be missing but that’s nothing different to what the Stones did in the ‘60s.
8-What is the one thing you’d most like to change about the world?
With the RB7 Red Bull have taken this a step further, there is no appreciable exits in the tail of the coke bottle, so nearly all the radiator airflow ends up passing through the bulged outlet. This means the coke bottle is the slimmest and simplest of all the cars on the grid. Clearly the huge floor area and exposed beam wing show how easily airflow can reach the rear of the car. The concession Red Bull has to make for this benefit is the increased blockage in front of the rear wing. But as they are aiming for downforce from the more efficient diffuser and beam wing, the rear wings effectiveness is not such a concern. Other teams have similar low swept coke bottle shapes, but each of them still exploits some cooling exit at the back of the sidepod. Given enough testing a fully enclosed sidepod with the central bulged outlet could be copied.
Turns out it wasn't Poison Ivy, but an allergic reaction due to my worsening seasonal allergies.
I MISS: my old friends that are far-flung, and wish we could see each other more.
Start by sewing the stem first, the finished stem is 1/4" wide (I used the 1/4" bias bar to make mine). The ends of the stem are covered by other appliqué pieces so you don't have to get fancy with the ends. The middle of the tulips is sewn next. You don't need to stitch around the whole shape, just the part that will be visible and a bit beyond, when it is finished (remember to remove the paper). The leaves and the rest of the tulip are the last to be sewn on.
I asked Alex to come with me. His reply was, "Would that make you happy?" I said "Yes." Then he said, "This gift is backfiring on me."
Vermont (right there in New England
love is never worth it
JULY 1985
It doesn't surprise me for a moment that the Muslim Council of Great Britain thinks this is no big deal. It wants empathy. I'm sure many of its members are absolutely delighted by the idea that many people will now understand what happens when you don't give into Muslim demands, and that this is just and right, to be understood rather than condemned.
Starting in 1:18, Paul launches into a diatribe against the gentiles, condemning their idolatry and accusing them of trading “God’s truth for a lie” (v.25)
A shoot last week for the very nice people of BGS Architects in Oxford. Anna (the project architect on this 60s listed building) did a fantastic job of moving the furniture so we could get some great images.
Kurdistan Iraq: a country within a country. After Saddam’s violent oppression of Iraqi Kurds, they stood up in ’91 whilst Saddam’s army was engaged elsewhere, during the first Gulf War.
The article appreciates the vision of the upcoming designers, like Azeeza Desai, who are focusing on meeting high standards, or like it says, ‘bigger picture’:
Darlene and Chrissy
After I got used to the flow of the novel — I’m pretty sure I was lost at the term “cryogenically frozen” — I fell into a groove of reading it. The beginning was quite disturbing, but it sucked me in nonetheless. After that, I could not put this book down, for the life of me. I think one thing that I enjoyed was that this was a dystopian that didn’t take place on a transformed and beaten-to-death Earth — it was refreshing to read one that took place on a space craft, even if that makes the reader feel the same claustrophobia as the characters.
I wasn't able to find any history on the next tourist destination, but the cover lists the location as "The Sky Club and Cocktail Lounge" at 36th Avenue and Tamiami in Miami, Florida (Tamiami Managment Group on 36th Avenue in Miami was the closest I could get, but I don't think they bear any relation to one another). Remember the little "fightin' Irish" boy from a few Fridays ago? I'm pretty sure this is his son, of whom I have another dozen photos from WWII and the forties', wearing a killer art deco tie and with a pretty, bright eyed woman in a great dress. See the two tone yoke? The oversized collar? The slightly belled sleeves? You know this number was a knockout in real life, if we could only see the colors and the handbag that went with it.
Which is much more my point of view.
I reached out to touch the tree to see and feel if it was there or not. Well apparently it was not. Because what I thought was a tree’s trunk was just more space I could occupy. And occupy I did moving into the space that looked like a tree but was blurred as it vibrated to the frequency of the tone I was emitting.
I wonder if the level 90 requirement will make it to Live or not.
“While large-scale oil-shale development offers socioeconomic opportunities it also poses certain socioeconomic challenges that also should not be overlooked,” she testified. “Oil shale development like other extractive industries can bring a sizable influx of workers who along with their families put additional stressed on local infrastructure. Development from expansion of extractive industries has historically followed a boom-and-bust cycle making planning for growth difficult for local governments.”
this child's insides or his thoughts. I wrote it in his voice and simply felt that if I could just
Bottom line: Judge Berchelmann was asked by the Commission on Judicial Conduct to serve as a fact finder, but instead he acknowledged then ignored the facts, characterizing them in a disingenuous way to excuse Judge Keller's usurpation of the duty judge's responsibilities under this "oral tradition."
Have you tried any color/circle lens? Any recommendation what lens would be nice for asian?
Moderate cardboardy bitterness, which is almost always an indicator of weak or adjunct malt grains. Crisp lager feel, but the odd bitterness overpowers the funk that a pils should have.
It seemed like only yesterday I was graduating high school and just starting what I thought would be an awesome life...college, majoring in nursing and living life.
Under the title of ‘General Works” and ‘Transportation Services’, it has won a numerous public contracts.
I admit it, I’m completely addicted to the new HBO series Game of Thrones (based on the series by George R. R. Martin). I’m a total sucker for anything like Tolkein or Herbert’s Dune series, and there’s elements of both here. So, count me in, guilty pleasure beyond belief. If there’s political intrigue between warring forces in a setting like yet unlike our own, I’m down. It’s always nice when you come to something expecting to be entertained, and get something a bit more substantial.
I learned about Patrick McCullough’s death from a poignant letter his younger brother, Fr. James McCullough, a member of the missionary Kiltegan Fathers, wrote recently to the Irish Times newspaper seeking an inquiry into official indifference towards his brother’s killing. I contacted the priest to talk about his experience.
Over the weekend, I finally got around to staining and hanging my new fireplace mantel and I couldn't be happier with the results!
1 tsp. oregano
constraint upon ourselves to be right; but oh, that we were like Thee,
This 5-part series is about how I would correct/fix various design issues within the Toronto Transit Commission (TTC). This is not about how I would change bus routes, or how one mode is better or worse than another mode (i.e., LRT vs. Subway). This is about how I believe the TTC (and other transit authorities) can improve the experience of engaging and interacting with it’s ridership (actual and potential). Here is part four.
The weather was fine - until the Kesch-Hütte. I passed the doctor ("Heya, how are you feeling?" - "*gasp* *gasp* Guess! *gasp* *gasp*" - "Okay, he's responsive. Have a good run then!"), and right after that the weather changed. It was about 4° C, and it started to rain. The hard part was over, right? Wrong…
(9) Turning it in the hand and viewing it from different angels, as it were, the Hebrew poet could more fully demonstrate its latent significance.
(Off screen)
Mass. Mother made everyone of we girls
the more unwilling to accept this fact I become. I still
Kristen went and got a pool for the little ones to play in. they weren't so sure about the moss and the lake.
A couple days after she had left, I would be taking the panty du jour off the top of the folded ones in my underwear drawer and I noticed a very small piece of paper with a little note written on it accompanied with some cash.
these eyes are darker, duller, downcast, waiting for the next blow.
Anyway, the J.Crew-1 find out about the broken engagement and now they don’t even know when they’ll be returning to Joseon. But dudes, you’re already fading so it means it’ll be happening soon so what’s the problem? To be honest, I don’t even know what’s happening on this show. Man Bo touches his hand and feels it. Does it mean they are no longer fading? Anyway, they decide that they should be good subjects and get their master and his lover together. Again.
I love my Ray's Arithmetic. Clearly you can tell its been through many hands. There are many reasons to choose Rays but one reason I admire the most is how naturally it teaches a child to reason. Knowing how to reason is crucial in the upbringing of a child. Being able to reason clearly enhances a child's ability to make well thought out decisions and to work through situations and problems. In short, when's person can reason then that equals to thinking outside the box and helps one find solutions to a myriad of situations that come in life. That's why we choose Rays for the first 6 to 8 years for their math. I know it might seem an odd thing to think of an arithmetic curriculum that actually teaches you how to reason but this one does. Obviously, most anything that was written in the 1800's you will pretty much be guaranteed to find reason written within the pages. Here are a few problems one of my little daughters were working on today.
For the teenager who’s into “texting” there is the more serious problem called “sexting” that can lead to all kinds of trouble. The harsh realities of this are explored in a young adult novel, Never Been Kissed, by Melody Carlson ($9.99, Revell, softcover). All Elise wants is her first kiss before she turns 16, but when a friend’s poor advice and modern communications technology combine, she finds herself on a dangerous path. Accused of “sexting”, she gets kicked out of school. This novel shows teen girls the impact of their choices when it comes to respecting themselves. Revell is famed for practical books that bring the Christian faith to everyday life and the author has penned more than two hundred books. Check it out at http://www.revellbooks.com/. For the same young adult crowd, there’s The Princess of Las Pulgas by C. Lee McKenzie ($16.95, WestSide Books, Lodi, NJ). This is a gritty story of a girl’s life after her father’s death forces her mother to sell their oceanfront home and move to Las Pulgas, the site of a tough urban high school where Carlie is dubbed the princess for her aloof ways. This is a novel about a difficult process of transition and is timely in difficult economic times. It tells of a challenging learning experience as Carlie learns that not everything is as it seems. The eighth book in the Good Girlz series, Drama Queens, by Reshonda Tate Billingsley ($11.00, Gallery Books, softcover) is all about friendship. The Black Christian national booksellers list ranks the author number one on the list. In this novel, high school is coming to a close for the Good Girlz and Camille, Angel, Alexis, and Jasmine are ecstatic to discover they’ve all been accepted to the same Texas University, Prairie View A&M. Need it be said that changes, many unanticipated, lay ahead? The girls learn a lot about relying on their faith and each other when facing life’s tough decision.
I even put FCF in this category of organizations although supposedly on the same side of this argument against this type of over regulation. However now that certain animals have been lifted from this bill I am not so sure this breeder is as concerned as she was…Her interest is not un-shelfish…indeed if it goes thru then she can write some more on being the great rescuer of animals, after all, she did offer her assistance in removing the animals from Ohio like some ‘pest control’ might have done…oh yes, I have a bone to pick with that one…BIG TIME!!! She has said and done some of the stupidest things that have hurt the efforts of Private Exotic Animal Owners everywhere…not sure where she gets this stuff…cough…barf… Can’t she just shut-up and let others take action?!? OMG!!! Talk about stupid…a real piece of work that one…Just another private ‘country club’ of exotic animal owners.
People’s Square (人民广场) is a large public square adjacent to Nanjing Road in the Huangpu District of Shanghai, China. Prior to 1949 and the establishment of the People’s Republic of China, what is now People’s Square was a part of the horse racing course of Shanghai. After gambling and horse racing were banned by the new Communist government, a part of the race course became the People’s Square, which included a large avenue and spectator stands for use during parades.
After I swallowed down the initial instinctive distaste bordering on horror, I started thinking …
11) Through the door, I heard my classmate say, “Hey, Stephanie? Are you ok?”
The only new doctor we saw this month was the new orthopedic. He is wonderful. He told him about the previous braces. He said that he didn't think we wanted to put her in any braces as of yet but that we wanted some xrays done just to see how things were looking. (Which is something the other doctor didn't do) So we went down the hall and had them done. He came back into the office and told us that everything looked great. He didn't see anything that would keep her from walking. He was going to cast her, for her feet, but felt that it would be better done after she is a year-old due to her reaction to the previous bracing. We all agreed that it was a great idea. We left his office feeling very optimistic about Rylee's future!
I only sanction martyrdom operations in defense of a plundered and occupied land.
cheney apologizing for his "inbreeding" joke...hey, west virginia this is what they REALLY think about you! cnn online has a video of his speech and apology, but hey...
I wish that I could put the same smile on Stella’s face as the Napoleonita did. It was like a French martini only more so. Since the Napoleonita didn’t use Chambord which Ryan said was a one note liquer and did use Trennel Cassis a more full flavor liquer the Napoleonita delivered a more full flavor.
Related News Links:
The sentiment is from October Afternoon and is a rub-on offered in one of their Santa Sacks that I bought in December - awesome deal! And how about those little clouds??! They are a die cut from L'il Inker Designs - love how the stitching is built right in!!
On Sunday, we went to Old San Juan. We took the tren into San Juan where we caught the boat to Old San Juan. It took awhile to get there but it was easier than trying to drive there. Things were more crowded than normal as the Fiestas de la Calle San Sebastian was going on. Sunday was the last day. I really wasn't sure what to expect, but it was pretty cool. All along the street were tons of local artisans and venders. Unique art, handmade items, etc. We sat and watched some live music on stage while the kids danced in the open area. We then headed over to the huge area full of arts/crafts/food tents. It was overwhelming!! We bought some traditional PR food..........which cost a few arms and legs!
Look out, mama, 'cause I'm comin' home tonight.
I have always wanted to help others, and have many family members in the social work field, but the passion for justice, fairness and the challenge to balance the two intrigued me. The uniform and the physicality of the job was a perk as well.
The movie is coming out in Japan on June 30th 2012, JST, and tickets will be available for pre-sale from April 21st. Fans that pre-order tickets wil get a ‘clear-file’ (a plastic sleeve that hold documents); this can be used as a bag. They will also get an invitation to a gathering attended by 2PM and 2AM! How awesome is that!
the arms of the beloved. She will be
I needed my football. I was going through withdrawals, and wanted nothing more than to sit in the recliner all day watching football. I woke up, turned on the pregame shows I watch, and relaxed while soaking in the wonder of football.
Tests- 37, Wickets- 216, Avg- 24.21, 5W- 21, Best- 7/40
I started off with some different canvas butterflies They come already inked around the edges for the total distressed look.
Which is manly enough for even my DT pal Ted while still being cute enough for me. Add a strip of paper and up the cute factor. Not to mention the fact that it's easily $10 shorter than most glass pumps on the market.
Remember you have until March 16th at noon CST to enter our current challenge, CAS for Kids. You do not have to send in your card after entering, but if you did, you would put a smile on the face of a child inpatient in a children's hospital and that would be a great thing to do. The addresses and all the details are easily available under the tabs at the top of our blog.
Of course on my first day back I would get a call about a sick kid. This time it was Brody. He was causing quite the "stink" at "baby preschool." They called after his 3rd "incident" (it's a 3 strikes and you're out policy there when we're talking about this kind of illness! LOL) asking him to be promptly removed. Actually that's not true. They're so freaking sweet there they are always like, it's ok, no rush, get here when you can, we totally understand... I could not love this place any more, I swear. Anyway... I couldn't very well leave work early on my first day back soooo... it's Grammy to the rescue!!!
Cashmere – Wool from the Kashmir goat. Used in clothing. Alternatives: synthetic fibers.
If we can't articulate the reason why an agent should read our manuscript well enough to get a request for more material, how are we going to convince a potential reader to buy the book? And no, I don't believe that's the publisher's job. Hopefully we are going to have interviews and school visits and book signings to do. That's where our enthusiasm and our ability to tell a story, and to tell it well, are going to have to shine.
A waste of time
She nodded. "It has been pretty warm out."
Back tracking slightly, as well as messing around with the HST's, I've also been finding heaps of tutorials, one of them being the D9P Variation, which you can find here and the pics of the ones that Polly made with my fabric (whilst I was busy making some D9P's of my own!) are shown below. Sometimes, well usually, Polly usually brings her own projects with her (she lives next door so it's handy to have a crafty neighbour hey? lol) but when she doesn't and she's starting to look like she's going to spontaneously combust if I don't put her to work, I of course have to oblige! That night was one of those times muhahahaha, well she does call me the Evil One!
The really tricky - and slow - bit was the crocheted edging. I'm still at the learning stage and have to have a 'How to Crochet' book handy to check on the different stitches which is why it takes such a long time.
I'm not really into 'scary' movies. I did, however, want to see this one for the selfish reason of ogling David Tennant in leather. I couldn't find anyone to go with me, and when I passed the cinema on my way home from shopping it started to rain and I mean rain. It was a sign. I went in and watched it by myself, and ended up really enjoying it. Anton Yelchin is so adorable, and a good actor. The story was predictable, but tolerable and the comic relief actually had me laughing out loud at times.
I may be jumping the gun to the more serious part of collaboration here mainly because a friend of mine had been recently upset become someone they had worked with in the past took their original idea and used it to write a book and publish that book.
Molluscs have an outer layer of tissue, or skin, called ‘mantle’. In many species, the mantle secretes calcium carbonate (CaCO3) to produce the hard outer shell, like the ones we tend to imagine. When any minute particle such as a grain of sand or even a tiny fish gets lodged in the mantle, it secretes a special substance known as ‘nacre’, to encapsulate the irritant and protect itself.
This photo was taken about four years ago before the new dark green shingles were put on,
They live in a traditional joint household, several oblong wings surrounding a central courtyard. Three generations (25 people) dwell under that corrugated tin roof. The Kumaris are lucky - they have their own family well nearby and don't have to go far for water.
The rise in popularity of life settlements lends further support to the proposition that living benefits life insurance is the right thing to do for our clients. The costs associated with terminal, chronic and critical illness means that many clients cannot afford to continue paying the premiums on their life insurance policies. Instead, in an all-or-nothing transaction, clients are forced to accept a steeply discounted payment in exchange for their life insurance policy.
* Spellbinders Nestabilities: Picot Edge Circles
In a few days, Betty Buff Sugarscrubs will be taking over from Tasmia Trinkets and Charms as Henado Business of the Month. We will be telling you lots more about them in the next few days, but for starters, here is what they say about themselves:
Subsequently, as a second photo of a lone blue-eyed, brown-haired Jaquelyn in her pretty pink lace dress and then a third of her with her proud papa [Marine Capt. Chris Nagel] at the park aired, Molly animatedly remarked, “Thanks for putting up the pictures of me. First-time mom knows, it’s, it’s a joy!” In response, perhaps, eagerly anticipating her own future maternal bliss with her new military stud hub [Navy SEAL Leif Babin], Jenna declared, “I love the picture of your husband and your little girl in matching sunglasses….That’s a great shot….The little girl is darling.”
And that's when it happened. "You have a guinea pig!? Oh, my girls had those when they were smaller!" She proceeded to recount her experience with what turned out to be either gerbils or hamsters. At the end I said "yeah, but I have a guinea pig, it isn't the same thing." She responded with "no, I know, but now, my oldest girl, she lives out in Sacramento, she has rats!" I say guinea pig and you say whatever small rodent you can think of. Totally the same thing.
-1 1/2 c zucchini
I believe that focusing directly on being happy changes what we choose to do for/to our kids, motivates them more and will ultimately make them (and us) happier. Rather than assuming that happiness will be the indirect result of doing homework every day, why not start with what makes (or will make) our kids happy and then tie that to things we can all do every day to accomplish that happiness?
My husband ultimately came colse to when he was able to speak with the Occupational Therapist where we got Jeremy evaluated. They promised to do whatever inherent to work with Jeremy to correct many of these issues. The whole topic of using medication to help Jeremy hasn’t come colse to for a while, but I know that my husband will be open to it if we have to do it. He’s had to deal with Jeremy while I’ve been out of town and it nearly put him over the edge.
Written when Lovecraft was only 17 or 18 years old, this short story was his first published piece, appearing in a 1916 issue of The United Amateur. As such, it features a few elements that would carry over into his later work (the black magic theme; an even-then archaic writing style) but is missing the otherworldly Cosmic Horror for which he would become most famous. I admit that I am not extremely familiar with Lovecraft's output, but starting right here, at the beginning, I plan on changing that.
Magenta - Cardboard cut with
This Wednesday was the second grade parents' turn to host "Teacher Appreciation" day for the OG's school. Dutiful mom that I am, I signed up to bring brownies.
When you do that, try to twist some of the cliches into new forms. Make the white supremacists the good guys. (Now THERE is a challenge!)
We had a lot of fun. At first Lexi was upset. She is really, really shy and
I decided two layers was enough for me so I left it there, intending to make some matching earrings with my remaining beads. I also purchased an extra pack of the same beads from the tutor so I could make a matching necklace too.
of questions) in March of this year, the Department of National Defence said: Oh, by the way, we didn’t count the cost of keeping the F-35 in the air – you know little things; like pilots and gas.
Incredibly.
And as far as sunrise is from sunset,
I said: Marley look at that huge chicken! Do you see it?
and she taught me to cross-stitch and
Highly attentive, the students were quick to notice as soon as a glass needed to be refilled or a plate removed, even if one of them had difficulty remembering the name of the next course and another wrestled with the wine bottle while trying to open it. Knowing that the servers are learning the trade is part of the charm of dining at Vatel. Fortunately, they didn't make the mistake of trying to remove our dessert plates until after we had finished every last crumb!
Region of ancient Greece frequently chosen as background for pastoral poetry
Certainly we'd all seen the Barsoomians and their asteroid-spaceship on the news and knew the whole story about their journey through spacetime from the living Mars of a billion years ago to the flourishing-Earth-but-dead-Mars of now but none of us had ever seen one in person. What was going on?
I'm learning just how old I really am these days. I have the desire to go out and dress up and have a good time, but I have no desire to get up and actually do it. I mean, it's 9:14 on a Friday night and I'm at home. I'm single! I should be out painting the town red. But I'm perfectly content hanging at home watching a movie or taking a hot bath. I could totally go to bed any time. I know... it's pathetic.
I successfully resisted a lot of things I might have purchased in the past, by focusing on items that I really liked and thought I could use in the (sort of pre-planned) capsules for May-September. What do you think of the new purchases?
so they will take it off me!
While the remaining 10 percent of the budget… is spent in the Service and Parts Departments.
Once by Anna Carey
"Rinse and repeat" for all of your dies! Once I had my system in place for one envelope, I recruited Jeremy so we could assembly-line (and speed-up) the process. The eye roll and huff :) I got was worth the time it saved.
Life on a farm can be fun. It can also be really unpleasant. When we first got our Wyandotte chickens, we culled down to two roosters and waited to see who would reign supreme. The smaller of the two (Spot) appeared to be the better provider and protector, but Dinner (we were supposed to eat him) was far prettier and had a better crow. Well, we got complacent and decided that having two roosters was fine. They fought a little, but eventually worked out a deal - Spot got 7 hens, Dinner got 4 - and they basically shared the same space without too much commotion....until this spring.
She roped her very brave, lovely hubby in on a project too!
I rolled out early and headed for the computer (disregarding the dog wanting feed before sunrise and before going out). I wanted my morning fix of blogs. That’s the equivalent of saying I rose sick this morning.
It also noted that developing the oil would pose “socioeconomic challenges,” which included bringing “a sizable influx of workers who along with their families put additional stress on local infrastructure” and “making planning for growth difficult for local governments.”
If want avoid those reductions and provide full scheduled benefits - that is, to "fix" Social Security, we can. In fact, it has been tweaked any number of times over history. Indeed, in 1983, the trust fund was not 21 years away from running out of its surplus, it was a few months away from it - but some tweaking based on recommendations from the Federal Reserve fixed the problem. That was a far worse situation that anything faced now and now almost no one even remembers it. Dealt with and done.
not surprisingly, MOST of our taxes are going to the military. the bank bailouts are included under "government". check it out:
Any Vicks Product $1/1 - expires 3/31/2011
out before we buy the rest of them, but so far
Why should this be the measure of how well your investment does?
This was my most anticipated Asylum film of the year and it didn’t let me down it was phenomenal! I was blown away by the directing, writing, music, cinematography and special effects.
Bento for LT to bring to School, same food as above except he's having strawberry bread. I do not like how this one turned out as well, had in mind a bigger fish and cat. I've no idea why I ended up making them so small, had to cover up the spaces with picks and baran. And I should have used a different cheese/colour for the fish details.
It’s your thirtieth birthday. You have a successful career as a marketing executive in the San Francisco Bay area. You wake up strangely unexcited. You have lunch with your wife whom you adore. Later, you and your wife gather with friends in a local bar for dinner and drinks, in celebration of your big day.
Having watched ‘Waking Life’, now I wonder about how many potential brilliant films are there hidden waiting for me to find out about them.
There you had it, I focussed on a weighty issue, and gradually we discussed my binge eating.
5 large egg yolks
she thought she didn’t want,
A second sceptic is used to manipulate the audience into believing, and that’s what the Leanne Rease-Jones character is for. She’s a healer who doesn’t believe in the ghost either, so when she starts acting weird and more or less orders Claire to get her stuff and get out of the Inn, you know that shit is going to happen.
To take the more alarmed views first, it would perhaps have helped if some of the commentators on the case had taken the trouble to read the judgment. HHJ Birss goes to considerable effort to explain how narrow his decision actually it is. To begin with, there is no suggestion that if two people standing next to one another take the same photograph the one who pressed the shutter momentarily later will somehow be infringing the copyright in the photograph taken earlier. Copyright infringement requires copying, and although such copying maybe indirect or even unconscious it is still necessary to show a causal link between the original work and the allegedly infringing copy.
“Hey Narcissist, smile.” Nikolas used his phone camera to snap the goofiest picture of his partner Leonard could make. “Perfect.”
Ref: Stephen Hawking’s book ‘A Brief History of Time’. / ART II, Dogon, 2012, Samij Datta
-Room of One’s Own
If we had to use a relative term of description to distinguish the term God, we might say that the word God is the opposite of all other words. It’s not like the others at all. Given that, to say anything, we would be limited to all those other words that are like that one, “God is not like those” is really about all we could say.
MM: Well.. okay. But I still don’t like Derek.
Are you like me? Always when I read words from scripture that talk of rest or being restored or giving peace, my heart skips a beat. I want in on that offer. An offer of rest for this busy heart and mind of mine, yes please.
He put his arm around her. “It’s ok Ri, I’ve practiced a lot, I’ve got my license and my dad says I’m ready for passengers. I want to take you for a ride. It’ll be so much fun and I’ve packed us an awesome dinner, even dessert.”
1 music
Although biologic drugs have been the most incredible blessing in my life since I was diagnosed with Rheumatoid Arthritis (RA) because I’m able to move around now so more than ever, I still cringe every other week when it’s time to stick a needle in my body. And when I say I still cringe, I really mean that I jump up and down, swear, scream and all around act like a 5-year-old who was denied candy. I have these temper tantrums not because I’m afraid of needles, but it just creeps me out when I inject MYSELF with a needle. Honestly, I have no problem with registered RN’s taking a stab at me (they do it all the time), but I am no trained professional.
It was declared the 2012 best blog in the lecturer category in the blog contest held by the Faculty of Social Sciences Education (FPIPS) of the Indonesia University of Education (UPI), Bandung. The announcement is here.
But the same week, she asked me, “What if we stopped all the crazy stuff?” And I told her what she wanted to hear, which was the truth. The truth, boiled down if I knew how to speak clearly, was: “I want to be with you. The games are a sideshow.”
Sam: Mom, do they have volcanoes where we're going camping?
Shannon Ganshorn is a high school teacher and mixed media. She lives in White Rock, BC, Canada with her husband in her 1950s bungalow. She spends her free time garage sale-ing, gardening, and riding her bike around town.
Anyway, it's a quiz about my 2011 year. Since I didn't really give you a list of my goals and plans for 2012, this seemed a good substitute.
What is ink blowing? Grab a piece of paper and with your straw put drops of thin paint (acrylic watered down) or ink on paper. Blow through the straw, pushing the paint around the paper. Let dry and embellish if needed. I love this new technique however my head did not.
Are you Happy when you see “RAINBOW”?
The Theresienstadt account takes up where this prologue leaves off, and Ben Barkow outlined its main events - Klaus Leist reading relevant sections - from the first horrible experience, the Schleuse (sluice) when newcomers were deprived of all possessions they had brought, afterwards being put to sleep without cover on the floor of bare stables and later of barracks. However, Manes was very soon put in charge of the 'Orientation Service', meant to direct those who were lost in the ghetto. This was necessary because although Theresienstadt was a small town, built for a population of 7,000, it now held over 50,000, many of whom were disorientated and traumatised: there are, as Barkow said, many heartbreaking stories in the book. Manes was proud of his work in the Orientation Service, which he developed into a kind of adult education centre and cultural agency, organising over 500 lectures, play readings and music concerts in two years. German officers were rarely seen in the ghetto - the place was policed by Czech gendarmes - as the administration tried to keep up an appearance of normality, which the prisoners tended to support 'for the good of the ghetto'. Many, however, sensed an air of unreality which reached its peak in the 'beautification' of the town in preparation for the Red Cross visit of June 1944. Manes's attitude, Barkow said, was realistic, if not cynical. He knew that the measures were meant to cover up the truth, but accepted them. As he wrote: 'Whatever the reasons, they make our life better.'
The City Council responded: “No matter who manages the council house, rents will be only spent on housing related services.”
adding grid upon grid above it
I would love to hear from anyone who has moved across the country or a long distance, please feel free to provide me with any tips or tricks that you have learned along the way. I have lived in Northern California my whole life and have moved only short distances before, this will be my first long distance move. We will also be driving the 2,700 miles across country with our two Cocker Spaniels, so if you have any traveling tips please let me know.
*Be respectful, courteous and law abiding.
Thanks for stopping by to visit. Let me know you came and I'll return the favor.
Also this year I have "signed" up for an ATC exchange - one a month. For January the word is "Hope" - so I will also be thinking about where I want to go with that. "Your ATC should reflect what hope means to you or what visual the word gives you." Hmmmmm... Nope, Harley won't cut it for the "H" - back to the drawing table. Be safe over the next few days if I don't get back before New Year's Day. Don't drink and drive. Find a designated driver or take cab companies up on free rides. Whoop Whoop!
The agreement, Mr. Karzai said during a midnight signing ceremony at his presidential palace, opened “a new chapter in the relationship between the United States and Afghanistan,” one marked by “mutual respect.”
I was layin' round town in a house of ill fame,
“There will be a vast majority of entertainment such as food and Japanese Taiko drumming, and Afro-Cuban, gospel and Irish music.
which hung uninspired,
-More of my favorite reads, links and resources.
The IPKat is delighted that progress has now been made though he suspects that the reduction in international filing fees, particularly for the poorest countries, is going to make a huge difference to annual filing statistics; for the poorest countries the cost of satisfying the criterion of global novelty is almost always going to be higher than the cost of filing. Merpel says, it was always understood that the Organization should move on -- but that doesn't mean that there shouldn't be some changes in its governance. Tufty chimes in: Singapore??? Is there a story here? We thought Singapore was doing pretty well for itself.
The guest house we stayed in Kanyakumari has a wide vast sea front and being at a distant elevation the sight was grand with the Vivekananda Rock memorial and Tiruvaluvar statue to left and Gandhi Mandapam and Kamaraj memorial at beneath, the sea was stillness to ships and boats sail on. The most emotional and heartfelt moment of the travel was visiting my friend Razick’s home in Tirunelveli and I could not say a word how I felt when faint with love.
4. What is your favorite makeup product?
AnoHana is a show that I can recommend to anyone that doesn’t particularly hate drama. If you want an emotionally rich tale about friendship and loss, this show is certainly worth watching. It’s only a measly 11 episodes anyway. The pacing is quite high and even though the show sometimes gets side-tracked, it corrects itself fast enough to prevent serious damage. Do watch out for the ghost of a dead girl dragging the plot along though, it could ruin the believability pretty badly.
He must refuse to follow the treacherous path of former President Bush and announce immediately, or in any event no later than the fourth anniversary of his ascension to the Office of the President Elect, that he will promptly occupy a glorious new and equally unprecedented office.
The rules of this game is to nominate 15 different bloggers that you think are versatile. There are so many. Its going to take me a minute or two to pick and choose. Especially since I've been surfing the eye candy instead of writing.
Act No. 671 in full is as follows:
My uncle walks up to stand in front of me. He holds out the Helix rule book created by our first leader. Placing my hand on the cover I can feel every little crack and crevice in the old leather.
By DEB GRUVER As homeowners hit by the EF-3 tornado that twisted and turned along I-135 begin to rebuild, Sedgwick County officials are thinking about how far to go to help them do so.
Monday 29th - Bank Holiday, no official group meet.
And you shall put pure frankincense with each row, that it may go with the bread as a memorial (anamnesis) portion to be offered by fire to the LORD. 8 Every Sabbath day Aaron shall set it in order before the LORD continually on behalf of the people of Israel as a covenant for ever. 9 And it shall be for Aaron and his sons, and they shall eat it in a holy place, since it is for him a most holy portion out of the offerings
1 weren
Nails: L'Oreal Penthouse Pink
My Mother always seems to have a bit of land she is tinkering with & growing items to add to the dinner table. Think tomatoes, beans & squash. Her green thumb, is in the garden.
And, therefore, it should not be the only political issue Christians care about. What about the poor? What about war and support of oppressive regimes abroad? What about the number of dilapidated schools in EVERY city in this country? What about the state of race relations 35 years after the civil rights movement?
“How could this guy be who he says he is? He doesn’t go to the same church I go to. In fact, he doesn’t even belong to the same denomination as me! How can he know anything? You’ve got to be wrong, Philip!”
Martha Grace Reese conducted the largest study of mainline congregations and evangelism. Her research showed — we don’t do evangelism very well — surprise, surprise. But, here’s the thing … of the mainline congregations that were growing there were three very basic commonalities … so basic, she says, that you might miss them at first.
Lu of Lu's Raves and Rants has the final challenge of the Readathon. "Take the letters of the title of a book that you read during the readathon. Using at least HALF of them, rearrange the letters to create a word that DOESN’T exist. Make up a definition for your new word. Be creative and have fun!"
This weekend Daren is taking the ethics portion of the bar (“the MPRE”). The closest place it’s offered is in Moscow, ID (about a 2 hour drive). He’s been studying hard so I hope it shows on the test! He’ll take the rest of the bar test this summer. We’re still looking for options for a job after graduation in May…anyone know of any firms that are hiring??
You may or may not remember my epiphany that I'm addicted to productivity, and the realization that I don't relax very well. (Post is here.) Well, let me warn you that you might want to be careful what you put out to the Universe. The last month saw a few big changes for me and my family. My husband got a wonderful job opportunity, which in public education means that he gets to do double the work for the same pay. Two days later he was asked to take on another pretty hefty project. And now I no longer have one responsibility that used to be a good-sized time commitment.
Let them know you're sick of it
My life mate/soul mate and I did nothing on Valentine’s Day. For us, it was just another meaningless day given significance only because we were together. Most of my fellow bereft are dreading tomorrow, knowing it will bring an upsurge in grief. They are planning lunches with friends and special outings to keep from thinking of what they have lost. I too am planning to go to lunch with friends, and this very effort underlines my problem. I can find people to do things with, but I no longer have someone to do nothing with.
And the dry stone no sound of water. Only
I had a doctor's appointment already scheduled for Monday, as my OB wants to see me weekly from the start of the third trimester until this baby is born and I am happy to oblige him. I told him about Sunday morning and he nodded and affirmed that I'd done exactly what he would have suggested. Then he listened to the heartbeat for an extra long time. He said the accelerations were good and everything sounded great. Movement has been normal today, with the Deuce squirming through conferences with my students about their upcoming papers. And so we continue to hope that this false alarm is as close as we get to tragedy this time around.
I’m asking God for one thing,
I spent the entire afternoon sorting out new security arrangements for my mom, getting her car key immobilized, organizing an armed guard to be on duty for the entire weekend, day and night, sorting out insurers, arranging for electric fencing to be put right around her perimeter, dealing with the police – who, I must say, were absolutely amazing. And then I came home to find someone had ripped off and stolen the trellises that support the creeper on my external perimeter wall – making it now much easier to jump over said wall – which is what they did at my mom’s place – despite the fact that the wall is six foot high and has spikes on top.
holding ribbons
It's no secret I'm weary of this same daily whirl
I have been to other grocery stores where many foreigners go to in Jakarta. I find the prices at Cosmo cheaper or as cheap as some cheap stores. Yet, the vegetables looked fresh and nice here, which I was very pleased. I like the way Japanese grocery stores do packaging. In most grocery stores in Jakarta, you have to take vegetables and fruits to a weighing counter. There is someone who puts your vegetables or fruits in a plastic bag, weighs it and puts a price tag for you. At Cosmo, many vegetables are pre-priced and you can grab and put what you see in your cart without queuing at a weighing station.
They are able to deceive
Happy weekend everyone, xoxo
And I didnt vote at all in the mayoral election.
Let me give you an example: A German business man in Morocco is anxious to get the contract which was agreed on to be signed. He has a tight schedule and does not want to waste time. He has been waiting for what he considers ages to get an appointment with his Moroccoan business partner and is with time getting more and more frustrated. Finally he does get an appointment, and to his dismay, the meeting does not start punctually, and when it does, there were frequent interruptions, with people popping in to get papers signed, hold short discussions, and to crown it all the telephone never stops ringing during the meeting. You can imagine what the German business partner was going through…
I hope everyone had a fantastic Thanksgiving with their loved ones. Now some of the radio stations have started playing Christmas music to be heard from NOW until Christmas. To me it's a constant reminder that I'll never get done everything in time for the big day! LOL! Some how though it all manages to come together in the nick if time for most of us cuz I know I'm not alone in that feeling!
They live as martyrs
The charging system design was based on the collaborative review and analysis of existing charging strategies, the ergonomics of the connector and preferences of U.S. and European customers. The Combined Charging System was developed for all international vehicle markets and creates a uniform standard with identical electrical systems, charge controllers, package dimensions and safety mechanisms.
November already??? Christmas is right around the corner but I'm still stuck on Halloween.I love autumn colors and decided to create a large canvas piece using some of my favorite pieces from Basically Bare. This piece is proudly displayed on the main level of our home for everyone to see.
Today we have a masculine themed layout from Sue.
Now I’m not necessarily advocating this as the definitive format, as the technical aspect may prove overwhelming for some, but what I wanted it to demonstrate is the gulf between our methods and
I said nothing. It may have been that I was thinking; but if so, my mind was much too filled with sleep to be conscious of its thought. Instead, I became profoundly aware of my physical surroundings. The sky above my face in all its grandeur seemed to have been made solely for my benefit, and to be presented for my inspection now. I lay upon the ground as upon a woman, and the very air that surrounded me seemed a thing as admirable as crystal and as fluid as wine.
PFC Medina
View from my living room:
Friday E had no school. For some reason they start spring break here on the Friday before the actual week of spring break, weird?! It was a good day. No one was sick, although I did feel a bit of a scratchy throat starting in the mornings but nothing to worry about (or so I thought), kids were happy and helpful and C and I had Date night. How much better can it get?
Before I get to the usual "stuff" I'd like to announce that we had to say goodbye to 2 fabulous designers these last couple of weeks.
We just focused on getting the story board scanned in and getting the images cut and in the right order.
Well as you might realized, I'm feeling a little camera shy and mhmm insecure about my looks, so it's hard for me to take pictures of myself... I want to write an update about my new hair (I went to the びょういん yay!) and some outfits. But I don't feel like taking pictures lately. Maybe next time! I do wish I feel fine soon :P
Condominiums? I Never Use ‘Em
“I’m mostly better. I’ll go to work.”
I can’t even pretend to be sarcastic anymore. That’s how much I really just don’t care about this movie. Trevor wakes up in the hospital and is greeted by a rather seductive nurse…odd, being that his wife just died, but I’ll chalk it up to the director having zero idea what the flying blue hell he was doing. We learn that his wife was actually Kirsty Cotton from the first movie. If you’re wondering what relevance this has to the overall story, the answer is none, as she barely even appears again after this except in short, nonsensical flashback snippets. I’d make an over the top joke about this but…hell, I just don’t give a crap. This movie’s failure is so complete that I don’t even need to make jokes! The writing itself is a joke! That’s a goddamn miracle.
“This strategic realignment of Asean’s mission helps the association to address the increasing political and economic competitions in the global world.”
Suck eyeball juice!
We are not just celebrating this new release, but also Make It Crafy's new illustrator, Marina. Her work is gorgeous! I love Marina's Under the Sea collection, especially the beautiful mermaids and adorable seahorses.
Where do I even start writing and sharing with you the experience of the past week? So many steps, so many feelings bundle inside of me…
“Cut it out you two.” Ethan says. “I have a meeting with him this afternoon I’ll have a word then. Kate, Jamie get someone hired. I think that will calm him down.”
Then I left to meet Jo at her apartment. I called our mutual friend on my way and he worked on setting me straight. Why was I worrying about hurting him when he wouldn’t do the same?…Jo and I looked at our new apartment. I felt sick, I couldn’t even smile…I just cried. That’s all I feel like doing is crying.
According to MRMG Radio, Huffman told police she knew what she was doing was wrong ‘but enjoyed the attention’ from the boys.
We spent the whole week learning about patterns. We watched the Brain Pop Jr. pattern video as a quick introduction. I love this website! The children practiced rhythmic patterning by clapping while I read "Caps for Sale" and tapping them while we sang "Going on a Bear Hunt." We also completed a flipchart on the Promethean Board to learn how to create, extend and label patterns.
Elsewhere, it's no more a typical Jason Statham movie than The Bank Job. All of the action scenes are plain to see in the trailer. This is a slow-burning serial killer piece with more in common with Dirty Harry than The Transporter. Certainly, Aiden Gillen's villainous 'Blitz' has much in common with Dirty Harry's Scorpio; the rockstar swagger, the smugness and complete lunacy. Even the game he plays is the same, getting himself brutalised by the police so he can turn himself into the victim. Unfortunately, Sergeant Brant is no Harry Callahan and Jason Statham is no Clint Eastwood. The Stath is one of my favourite modern action heroes, but Blitz is simply the wrong showcase for his talents.
What is the general premise of the documentary, for anyone who hasn’t heard of it before?
Akshay’s face was turning into Red. He hit that menu card on Chandan’s head. I had no idea what was going on. I asked, “What the F*** is going on here?”
Looking at the opposite end of the spectrum, probably the WORST thing you could do is diminish or even ignore the significance of it’s impact on your partner. So make a point to recognize the loss as REAL by sharing your thoughts with one another. Take the time to reinvest in your surrounding family – grief begets isolation, so show your support and re-sync your lives to accommodate the loss as easily as possible.
After four months of hard graft in the bleak enormity of Garden Village (earlier) this week I was transferred back to Whiteladies, the grubby gnomeville where I live and were my adventures in the postman trade began (earlier). Every postal worker is a cartographer too (earlier) and what I mean by that is that postal work makes geography explicit by walking into all streets and all its front doors. The job unpacks streets and neighbourhoods and as exposure lasts its geography becomes internalized. And you want the geography to be internalized because only once it is in your head you can start planning short cuts and optimal routes. You don't want this mental map perfected to save time, though that is one aspect of it, but because it creates flow.
onion- sautéed with PAM and put aside
1. Barbara Manning - Through With People
«Thelma» AW2012
In director Baz Luhrmann’s contemporary take on William Shakespeare’s classic tragedy, the Montagues and Capulets have moved their ongoing feud to the sweltering suburb of Verona Beach, where Romeo (Leonardo DiCaprio) and Juliet (Claire Danes) fall in love and secretly wed.
The image above is an aerial photograph of an auto salvage location in Ayer Massacusetts. Annually over 10 million automobiles are recycled in the USA alone, making cars the number one recycled product in this fair land.
Our hotel was just two blocks from the white house and so must mornings we walked right by it.
Allergies as an excuse? I really do mean killer. And I'm still trying to get my house back in order after our guests. My office is still not all unpacked. That is also driving me crazy. I wanted to be unpacked 100% within a month. (We have too much stuff to manage it in a week anymore.)
are learning how to shoot.
So, originally the school where Princess Runwild attends said they would not be having a Valentine's Day party this year. Well, I don't know about you, but for me Valentine parties at school were just always such fun. You know getting to decorate your own little valentine box/bag and then everyone getting to go around and hand out their cute little valentine cards. Which speaking of said cute little valentines, once upon a time they came with their own cute little envelopes. No more. I suppose its not environmentally correct. Whatever....Personally, I liked the little envelopes. And you could recycle them if you felt morally obligated to do so.
Serves: 4
I don't remember how it ended but it was a pretty sweet dream.
In addition to increases in sudden heart attack, asthma and allergy, other conditions have been increasing since the mid-1990s and the advent of genetically modified food.
11-03 Denver, CO - 1st Bank Center
He reminds them of the wide eyes and wonder they used to have ...
We were driving last week into a colder climate where I saw a small pond with ice starting to spin its tentacles along the water. Soon the ice will win the day and the water will retreat into hibernation. We had just watched a movie about a man falling into an icy river. He tried valiantly to pull himself up on the ice pads floating on the river. The harder he tried to heave himself up; the faster the ice would break into pieces. Eventually the man gave up and swam for the shore. Luckily, he made it to safety.
It is not known if the ‘deal’ was completed. According to some rumors circulating on a notorious sex forum in Singapore, the couple has been operating an online sex blogshop offering freelance Singaporean students and women for sex and earning ‘commission’ off them.
So it was a mixed mailbag.
There is currently a private member’s bill in the House of Commons (second reading on 20 January 2012). This includes the key requirement that financial transactions be limited to non-cash (traceable) payments. You can track the bill’s progress through Parliament here.
The two words in Greek used in the above scriptures that are commonly mistranslated as such are arsenokoites and malakoi.
Yes, they are known for being very stubborn animals but heck, wouldn't you be stubborn if you were used as a beast of burden on a day-to-day basis, quite often overburdened with goods?! Sometimes, being forced to put your life at risk for your human counterparts as they put you into dangerous situations carrying explosives in wars. Apparently, this was done in the Afghanistan war in remote areas. A donkey's life is not often an easy one so I think they deserve a little slack. They are actually very loyal and intelligent animals.
the support of NSALT, APLA, other and library associations in Nova Scotia.
Now, don’t let the name fool you: Raw Salted Caramel Apple Dip is so much more than it suggests. For breakfast, this is a delicious spread on toast topped with bananas, it makes an incredible cake frosting, and can even be used to sweeten up a smoothie. However, the very best alternative purpose I’ve found for Raw Salted Caramel is to use it as a raw tart filling. Simply make this crust recipe, fill the tart shells with Raw Salted Caramel and top with thinly sliced apples and a dusting of cinnamon. This was a brain wave at work recently, and the tarts were enormously popular. Such a simple, yet elegant autumn dessert that really takes advantage of the beautiful fruits in season. Pears would also be lovely.
Let me admit from the outset that I expected something special. You must come out of the gates strong and offer your adoring public a pint as legendary as your reputation. It is the opportunity to remind people just how astonishing the milestone is, and just what an important part of history your beer has been. You must wow people. You just must.
I have one "Little Fella" stamp set to give away to one lucky person! All you need to do is leave a comment on this post – please be sure to include your e-mail address so I can contact you if you win! You have until midnight on February 19th to leave a comment. I will post the winner here on Monday, February 20th.
Yes! I should name my blog 'Et Cetera'! I want to blog about this and that and this and that, etc etc. Eureka!
Claritin Save $5/1 24ct+ (4/22)
My cousin, Kathleen, and her hubby, Eric's, baby girl turned one years old this past Saturday, and we gathered in Asheboro on Sunday for her birthday party! She was even CUTER than usual (if that's even possible!) in her pink tutu and one-sie with a sparkly pink "1" on it! Lots of family and friends attended to celebrate this sweet girl, and it was such a fun time! She seemed to have a blast and was feeling the affects of the sugar from that cupcake because she was all over the place. She loved her presents and was the princess of the party! What a great day!
What's working for us: Online classes/activities/lessons are great. They work in a pinch when you haven't planned anything else, or when you are not feeling 100% (I had a headache most of the week since our weather was so variable). However, I'd have to say that if you are beholden to them (like having to use them for a review), then they can be a bit of a burden, too.
Have a good day !
happens, people are now being thrown in jail in Zimbabwe for calling
Just in case you thought Diamond was the name of May's horse, it was actually the Black Diamond, a passenger train that ran between New York City and Buffalo from 1896 to until 1959.
As much as kids might get on my nerves, I really hate traumatizing them or seeing them go through a traumatic experience, so you can only imagine how badly I felt after I totally scared a little kid at the park Friday mid-morning.
...This CD lives up to the high standards that Dr. Tintner and Naxos have set. I heartily recommend the entire series to all those who are unfamiliar with the composer and to comparative "Brucknerheads".
1) Closure
As Niall does his best to lure the barman over, I start tugging at his coat. There is a band setting up in the corner… keyboards, drums have been placed in position, a bass guitar is on its rack… mic stands are in place. And, there are faces that look extremely familiar along the bar; isn’t that…? That surely can’t be…? I tug again “Niall will ya look for pity’s sake… isn’t that…?” Two pints in hand, he turns round… and says, “Thought you’d fancy this… only found out by chance…"
4 cups of mushroom broth (that’s what I had on hand today–Pacific brand, but I typically use plain vegetable broth).
Osmosis, by definition is the act of a liquid, usually water that passes through a thin, semi-permeable membrane to equalize the solvent concentration on both sides of the membrane.
We had a few interruptions in March -- birthdays to celebrate in the first week, out-of-town guests in the second, and a visit to D's parents to prepare for -- and the trip itself took out the first week of April. But the new face on the room is finished: primed, painted, molded, caulked. Now all that's left is to clean up.
Four Google searches, one Google window!
________________________________________________________________________________________
“Power Living is being spiritually connected, mentally focused, physically energized, emotionally engaged, and environmentally supported. It is a way of being that allows life to flow. It is committing your energy to what you care about on a day-to-day basis.”
LOVED THEM.I thought I was soo beautiful and stylish!
Neilie Anne Heffernan Casey, 32, Wellesley, Massachusetts
With a Sony Walkman player,Just drag and drop from My CD.
Last week I found it really hard to adjust to the commute and long days, so it was difficult balancing blogging and work. I was able to schedule posts almost every day, but I was too exhausted when I got home to comment on everyone's blogs. I plan to move closer to work in the next few months, and hopefully I'll get used to the routine and won't need to pass out as soon as I get home!
Signed 2/2
My card is made using mainly brown and gold. For the golden part I embossed different areas of the card using a golden glitter embossing powder and also covered different parts with Stickles.
transparency is in the eye of the beholder
Eventually, when the rigorous calculations were complete, the official measurement came out at around 18 kilotons. When your margin of error includes orders of magnitude, that’s incredibly precise, especially when your equipment is a torn sheet of paper vs. the most accurate, sophisticated, and expensive scientific instrumentation of the day.
The soul! yourself I see, great as any, good as the best,
The Mississippi climate is also in his favour.
an anonymous caress,
I quickened my pace and she took my hand in her soft wrinkled hand. I instantly felt the warmth. My eyes became moist. I wanted to ask her so many things but my courage failed me.
their dumbly curious filaments
Author Pearl Cleage's blurb says it best " Ada's Rules might be a diet book disguised as a novel, and it might be a novel disguised as a diet book, but I guarantee it will make you laugh and make you think, while it nudges you oh so gently in the direction of a brand new way to think about and celebrate your body"
“The government will not take responsibility for whatever research the MRC decide to spend taxpayer money on. This is unacceptable. They (MRC) must be held accountable for wasting taxpayers money on psychological/psychosomatic research into ME. Where has all the psychiatric research benefited the ME community? Oh yes, clinics set up by the dept of Mental Health to give us CBT and GET. Wonderful!” Paul Dacre, Buckinghamshire; sick for 9 years
Invariably it's the afternoons when things really motor, ideas cement and fly. And it doesn't even seem to matter what flavour soup, they're all hot.
Including this one that I created with a new kit released today by Wendy of WM Squared Designs called School Days: Graduation. It is a mini kit, but it is packed! It also coordinates with her School Days full kit, and School Days - The College Years kit too!
One of the first novels in English … and a buoyant, postmodern romp. A hearty reminder of the power, malleability, and deep playfulness of the novel form.
(Note: I also used this page to die cut various letters and elements for a matching card.)
Islespoetrylibrary.4mg.com
Heat oil in a pan and add all the ingredients except bean.
so I'm a little worried about them.
My trot morphs into a sprint, the soles of my sneakers slapping the sidewalk impossibly loud.
I think about how it is sometimes hard to tell truth from fiction.
All right, so it's been a while, have at it. Tell me why I'm wrong about "Mad Men." Point out the movies I missed. (The Apartment isn't there and doesn't belong there; it's a comedy, and a satire, and very funny, and "Mad Men" isn't any of those those things.)
Creating a desired look isn't as difficult as many people know Calvin Klein into a popular designer status. The feat was backed by an impressive and very aggressive advertising scheme that helped further make Calvin Klein can be very difficult to keep going to their numerous selection of Calvin Klein, sexy never takes a lot of people, is one such brand which has gained the calvin klein truth of its collection of men and women on the calvin klein vest for you.
Jaleel & Kym – 8
“Zoophilia must be completely banned in the reformed animal protection law,” said Martin, referring to the governments plan to rework that section of the law.
Around the world there are so many countries entrenched in poverty, dictatorships, suppression, civil wars. There are droughts, famines, lack of infrastructure. People seeking democracy are mown down by government tanks or guns. The countries we have criticised for their barbarism are now laughing at the situation we currently have, at the Oxbridge graduates who've lost control of the country.
Finally, here's a picture of my tulips last week. They turned out lovely and since the weather's been a little cooler, they've held on for what feels like a long time. It fascinates me that the Anemone, in the upper left corner, blooms in the late summer, yet feels compelled to be one of the first things up in the spring. It gets pretty tall - about 5 feet - and I'll need to stake it better this year to show it off well. Such a treat when everything else is on its way out.
Now it appears that nine months after the fact the FBI sent four agents to the Jacobsen's home for a lengthy interview. Given her description of their meeting, the demeanor of these agents was not adversarial. In fact, in some ways they affirmed her intuitive response to the situation in which she found herself. Thus it is reasonable for Jacobsen to assume that "they believe something happened." What that "something" is may never be discovered. Or it may be discovered and never disseminated. At the very least their interrogation is a partial vindication of Jacobsen's intuition.
- Some great information about cultural competence and other social justice issues that were raised at the Social Justice in Early Childhood conference at the start of June
*GATES OF HELL – Radio Spot
- Avoid chemicals
Fever begins directly where Wither left off. Rhine and Gabriel have escaped Vaughn’s sadistic mansion of corpses and experiments but before long they are thrown into another dangerous situation when they find themselves trespassing on to a twisted carnival full of prostitutes and drugs. The ringmistress, also known as Madame, takes an instant liking to Rhine because of her unique beauty and resemblance to her late daughter and so makes Rhine and Gabriel her star attraction known as “The Lovebirds”. Rhine soon learns that the world of the carnival is just as dangerous and disturbing as the life she left behind but with guards with guns patrolling the tents and Vaughn, Madame, and The Gatherers desperate to own Rhine will she and Gabriel be able to get out alive in their pursuit to reach Manhattan?
-1/4 CUP PANKO BREADCRUMBS
When we really work on this third question in relation to our entire life we begin to gain personal integrity. It helps us choose what aspects of life to focus on and respond to…..what is important.
I can't wait to see what the next month holds.
cigarette ads
For the past few days, I had been craving nachos. A big plate of tortilla chips with ground "beef," olives and ooey-gooey cheeze with salsa and sour cream on the side. Luckily, I had everything I needed to make it in the house. Well, almost everything...I would have loved some guacamole. Maybe next time.
a glance
Noon–until the end. Lunch, ginko readings, and closing remarks at the Gray Dog Deli.
This place can get very busy especially on Friday nights where it appears that every office worker from the surrounding Hatton Gardens and City have turned up for an after work drink or evening session. Despite the fact that the Craft Beer Co has a generously large upstairs area and a big well designed bar in the main bar it gets so crowded that people are found outside perching on the market stalls which are left out in Leather Lane for the next day and drinking their beer. Guess that gets around the smoking ban without the need for a pub garden…..
ochre moss in laced stars
I show him what he has accomplished (in that highschool transcript checklist sort-of way) so-far. Austen is still a sophomore, he has completed the equivalent of 2 years of highschool English, 3 years of science, 2 years of social sciences, and numerous electives..but math?..and .. you know Gov't and U.S history. Well..We do have another 2 1/2 years. We agree to switch math programs that might be more effective for Austen.
"As iron sharpens iron, so a man sharpens the countenance of his friend."
Mr. McGuire: There's a great future in plastics. Think about it. Will you think about it?
Neighbor Nurse: iPhone.
The applicant responded by arguing that the claims would sufficiently describe the invention to qualify as a description. The argument was found convincing by the examiner who decided to keep the application pending. However, the office did not inform the applicant on this decision. The applicant got aware of this decision only after almost two years, when the GPTO notified the applicant that his right was lost due to non-payment of the filing fee.
Barker said, “Fifty percent of those people that brought their dogs to work felt that their dogs increased their productivity – that gets businesses’ attention when you say that, right?”
Swirling. Howling. Beckoning.
“I…I can’t stand this!”
- Leo Kottke and Mike Gordon (Fast folk guitar meets Phish for some weird jazzy folk numbers)
All you have to do is stay this way yeah
1500 - 4:17.85 - Tina Krebs, Clemson - '85
Age 27 (January 7 1985)
LGE thinks he’s white now? Well along with England and the other colonies, much change will be arriving in the form of 3rd Force (barring the lack of guts). PAP is rubbish, DAP is less than rubbish. Where are the real minority leaders that will ask for equality? Step forth and depose this product of nepotism! Trading in business populism, not even political populism, instead of common sense. Here’s your Malaysian yellow ‘Uncle Tom’ (to foreign powers in this case) much like LKY has typified the part for decades . . . keep partying in Australia on taxpayer funds while APARTHEID exists and keep abusing powers instead of amending laws, what happened to Wee should happen to LGE next . . . politicians are supposed to make life easier for the Rakyat then bow out after 2 terms, not parachute in because of nepotism. Unvotable and undemocratic!
I give him credit for that. James Cameron isn’t so much an old dog learning new tricks as he is an old dog learning new philosophy. You can knock him for not having all the answers, yet, or for relying on a few too many Hollywood tropes better left behind, but unlike the bulk of his characters, Cameron seems to finally have figured out that the journey is every bit as important as the destination. It’s gonna be interesting to see where the AVATAR story goes from here.
Here's a close-up of the photos:
2- Millions of Americans have come to rely on them as primary source of income and benefits.
The real and sustainable ways to help the housing industry and simultaneously those people of moderate income are to implement the reforms I propose. Among them are: a) Abolishing the property tax on primary residences of NJ taxpayers; b) Structural reforms in the extensive government apparatus of NJ abolishing one or more layers; c) Drastic increase in the minimum wage; d) State income tax code reform.
- What is the payout percentage of Bonus/variable pay by competitors?
It should've been simple. Pile in the car, & hit the road. Le sigh. Our satellite reception was scrambled. We were cut off by an endless string of douches and a-holes. Motorcyclists were kicking the passenger's windows as they nearly tipped over while trying to zip between our car and our neighbor's. We were cramped on Paris' midget Periph', bumper to bumper, praying for deliverance from our highway hell.
3. I enjoy reading two books to my children repetitively when they are young. They even let me do them in the crazy voices and never complain.
The next 2 shots then work together. First, we get the POV of the co-worker, seeing Manny right over the shoulder of the teller. Though he is unobstructed, Manny is still a good distance away to be seen too clearly. That said, this POV paints him as guilty.
One of her other friends came by during my planning because AK wanted to know what she needed to do for English. My answer: NOTHING. She doesn't need to worry about Macbeth. (He dies.) She doesn't need to worry about the next set of vocabulary words. She needs to take time to grieve. I told Brooke to tell AK that IF she just needs something to occupy her mind, I will be glad to give her what she will miss, but honestly, as far as I am concerned, if she doesn't do one thing more, she will pass my class. I always tell my students at the beginning of the semester that I have expectations. They will be expected to do their work, but I also tell them that I am an understanding person, and I will work with them when life throws them curves. The loss of a parent is more than just a curve.
- “What are you doing? I’ve spotted her already you know.”
And that, ladies and gentlemen of the jury, is how I justify buying one more photo, another letter, the filled-up photo album, the half-empty notebooks, and the Webster's of a different year.
Butter for baking dish
I will be speaking this year too. I am on a panel with Hank Shaw. Yes, Hank is the hunter of all hunters. Really. He hunts for his own food, he shares the stories, he motivates, he is marketing genius and he is just a really awesome guy that has a lot to share. Our panel is all about: BootStrapping a Book Tour: Modern- Day Marketing in today’s publishing environment.
Ivan Passer’s film of a classic post-Vietnam novel offers some highly disagreeable protagonists who fail to understand themselves any better than they do the case they decide to investigate when a woman’s body is dumped in a dumpster. Jeff Bridges and John Heard have never been better than when playing the eponymous losers in this fascinating and uncompromisingly bleak work. From ‘Cutter and Bone’ by Newton Thorburg.
Associate Professor Brian P. Farrell
09/04/12
“I discovered that I had Crohn’s disease, an inflammation of the bowel,” he explains. “Six inches of my colon are inflamed; without my measurements I wouldn’t know. But now I can do something about it before the illness causes serious symptoms.”
You will need to talk with your insurance agent to find out the costs of premium insurance as it is affected by the likelihood that an insured car will be stolen or damaged ans well as the car’s value at the time of the loss.
a gift given
For many organizations, lack of information, uncertainty, and a tendency to treat that gaping hole in the Titanic’s hull by calling a plumber, promote holding to the status quo. In the absence of an unequivocal case-changing course, why face the unpleasant prospect of change? Thus, many organizations continue to support under-performing executives due to either: a) a lack of solid evidence that they’ve failed, or b) witnesses. Killing a capo di tutti capi may be a good business decision, but it is generally uncomfortable for the person involved.
There are loads out there, from Barak Obama to popstars, but I was charmed totally by a set of little zoo gardeners knitted by a lady who cleans there. They’re all based at Paignton Zoo in Devon. which is none too far from where I grew up. And was one of the many places Mum would knit for the entire journey to and from. There are pictures of me in Dad’s photobox in a pram being pushed around the zoo and later of my brother and I having family days out, so it seems sort of fitting too as it links to my earlier piece about knitting heroes. As the photo showing both gardeners and their alter egos is part of a local newspaper report I sadly can’t share it here, so please click here to view.
I only bring up the relocation because it seems that, since we arrived in Northern Alberta last summer, the children (we have 3) are bringing home a virus every &%$@*%@! week. I’m not sure if it’s because this region is isolated and everyone is all crammed in together, people here are extremely unhygienic, or we’re just encountering a whole new set of strains not found in Ontario. Maybe some catastrophic combination of all three? *shudder*
My mom called the other day and said that her co-worker had divided some lilies and there were enough for my yard too. (Side story: My mom is retired. She doesn't have any real co-workers anymore. She plays bingo a few days a week and has gotten to know several of the regulars in the non-smoking section. They all text each other to see if they are going to "work" today. Bingo lasts from 10-2, so they call it the 10-2 shift.) Sunshine is one of my mom's co-workers. I don't actually know his real name and I've never met him, but I'm so thankful for his plants!
Driving home, I was at first despondent, but it didn't last long. Perhaps there was a lesson to be learned here. I had wanted easy assurance from a fortune teller that I wasn't making a mistake, but there are no shortcuts in romance. Love is a matter of faith. This thought put me in a good mood. The Madame Imeldas of the world weren't going to keep me from my soul mate. By the time I arrived at the Looking-Glass Cafe, I was so filled with joyful ardor I skipped right in the place. A couple guys at a pool table laughed at me, but what did I care? I was a paramour in paradise!
She: Do you love me?
Beet Root
Christmas eve is when the feasting begins which begins in a typically Chinese style. After my parents finish work they rush home and we start preparing the food for Hot Pot. This includes our annual dumpling making session and cutting up those century eggs which smell foul but taste awesome in hot pot.
But let’s take a look at the Electoral College (you know the only thing that actually counts). I will be using RealClearPolitics’s current projections which has Obama at 227 electoral college votes, the GOP at 181 and 130 in the swing category. Colorado (9 electoral college votes) and Nevada (6) have high Mormon populations, so that should swing them in Romney’s favor. Florida (29), which is always a close call, has a high Jewish population and we know the only way Obama could get less popular with the that population is if he actually said what he was thinking and started using words starting with a K (yes I think the bastard is a disgusting anti-Semite and I dare you to prove me wrong). And given Virginia’s (13) recent switches to a Republican Governor, it seems safer than not to assume that this will be a Republican advantage. So that leaves us with Obama 227 to Romney 238…yes clearly there is no reason to believe Romney could pull this out.
And here’s where my friends come in. Not only am I taking a lot of my CS classes with friends and partners, but they’re also boatloads more responsible than I am, when it comes to time. Having them around really helps me get crackin’ and working more efficiently. As we all know, two heads are better than one. This way, we can not only keep each other in check, but also help each other with the problems that the other might be having. I didn’t have the benefit of friends last year, so I’m really learning to utilize my friendships in the most efficient way possible.
If it attracts us, well it ?ust attract the fish, Yes? Wel? actually No. Just because we found the co?ors interesting or thought the ba?t was just t? pretty to l?ave behind, doesn’t ?ean that it’? actually g?ing t? ?atch ?nything mo?e th?n the one f?sh that i? buy?ng it. Yes that’s you, or me.
We did feel rather weird though about going on holidays when my home town of Brisbane was under seige due to the floods. It's strange watching from afar, recognising places and thinking about all the people affected by such devastation. Thankfully none of my family and friends and mutual scrapping friends were not directly affected either in Brisbane or Toowoomba.
I took this opportunity to knee him in the balls. Nonetheless, I felt a bit perturbed - after all, Paul Mason was once just five stone overweight, and probably didn't imagine he'd put on another 51. In addition, I'm only 5'2" tall, so any extra weight looks huge on me. What if my boyfriend was right?
God knows when you say hateful things, or have your feelings hurt.
I had to go back to the beginning and try to figure out why I liked writing in the first place. I had to isolate, so I couldn't see what I was "missing." I had to remember what it was like to write a story just because it was one I wanted to tell. I had to admit that my anxiety was out of control, and I needed help to get it back in check. I had to slowly rebuild faith in my ability to write.
The most aggressive and expansionist cultures are patriarchies. Islam is Arab culture forced onto non-Arabs, so of course it is a bad thing for non-Arabs when Muslim men (and women) are the vanguard of Arab cultural hegemony.
“For Christ also suffered for sins once, the righteous for the sake of the unrighteous, that he might lead you to God. Put to death in the flesh, he was brought to life in the spirit. In it he also went to preach to the spirits in prison, who formerly did not obey, when God’s patience waited in the days of Noah, during the building of the ark, in which a few, that is, eight persons, were saved through water. Baptism, which corresponds to this, now saves you, not as a removal of dirt from the body but as an appeal to God for a clear conscience, through the resurrection of Jesus Christ…” (1 Peter 3:20-21, emphasis added)
John Griffin is the chairman of Addison Lee- a minicab firm that operates in London. In the Ad Lib magazine, which is distributed exclusively by Addison Lee minicabs and private hire vehicles, he siad:
Except, by today, I was kind of finished with Valentine's Day. The girls were not, of course. They loved it more this year than ever (and it's all my fault), so I suppose all of the stress was worth it. Next year I'll plan better. I'll have to, because I'm afraid I have set an insane precedent and made another holiday tradition.
To win, all you have to do is comment on each of the designer's blogs. Following everyone's blog isn't required but we sure do appreciate it when someone new follows our blogs. The winner will be announced on http://mincedpaper.blogspot.com on April 27th.
I hope i’m getting paid for this, they made a big debacle about filling out your time sheets and how some internet system officially registers when you get into work. This would be the biggest plotwist of all time if I don’t even make my hours this week boo hiss.
Rusch's Diving Into the Wreck was one of my favorite Sci-Fi novels of 2009, bringing back the golden age feel that is missing in so many Sci-Fi novels nowadays. I'm happy to have Boss back in my life.
11. Rock Me to Sleep
I arranged to borrow a tent from the infamous Dan Nash, On unpacking it and figuring out which pole went into what hole and how many times you can say “push and Pull” and other dirty innuendos (giggidy!) while pitching a tent (giggidy) I happily discovered that it was huge! (giggidy), like a castle. Bigger than my apartment in Korea was. #Win
(I am the one with partially red hair)
09. Dirty (prod. by K21)
Vigil wondrous and vigil sweet there in the fragrant silent night,
"We hope that our haberdashery range is fairly unique. We try to offer some of the essentials, but also look for products that are hard to get hold of. We love our new lace edged polka dot bias binding, and have had excellent feedback on it. We also make our own bias binding, which can be fairly time consuming, but we think that it's good to be able to provide something that we've been able to produce ourselves.
The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo by Stieg Larsson was the number one bestseller in paperback.
5/Why does his name make you think of a spider? lol
A spokesman for the United States military in Helmand, Lt. Col. Stewart Upton, said, “We don’t have any issues with the governor’s statement.” He said American officials had been aware of the deaths and had immediately started an investigation.
A month later…
Should anyone be interested in some of the activities that Neighbourhood Networks has to offer then contact:
I hate to say these things. It is my nature to paint a brighter picture and to draw attention to the temporary time-line of this egregious period but it is what it is and all the promise of what is bright and beautiful and which lies ahead, does not change the conditions and concerns of the moment.
I was seventeen when he became a part of my life and songs like “It’s not for me to say” by Johnny Mathis and other hits like “Why do fools fall in love” and “Little Darling” went to the top of the charts of my youth. That was my generation and it was wonderful growing up long before rap music.
The city of Bismarck isn't wasting time assigning blame. It's swung into high gear, aiming its efforts at containing a 100-year flood. To compound matters, this is also an unusual type of flood. The problem is not just overland flooding. The ground water levels in South Bismarck are also extremely high. As astonishing as it may sound, this flood may go on for weeks or months. My boss has already evacuated and plans to be away from home for two months.
My littlest granddaughter, Ava Grace and her two friends are the cutest little things you have ever seen. They bonded when they were still in diapers. It is the sweetest thing how they absolutely adore each other. They are 5 years old now and the friendship just becomes more precious. I'm sure as they grow and start Kindergarten next year, there may be changes, but I think there will always be something very special between these three precious little girls.
Wherever you are, whatever you’re doing, try being nice to a suit today. They’re people too, remember?
So that the technical stuff doesn’t get buried I’ve decided to give each section a page of it’s own and direct traffic from posts.
Paul Daley’s e-mail address is pjdaleys@verizon.net
So that leaves us with an overnight guest tonight. He is the cutest thing when he gets all soaped up in the tub.
Would love to hear.Barbarax
Staley’s lawyer, John Stickels, calls the competency artificial.
She reached up to squeeze the rainwater out of her short hair. It was almost long enough to curl around her fingers. Time to cut it. It would never again be used as a weapon against her. Thoughts of rough hands tangled in her once-long hair flooded her mind, making her skin crawl. She banished the images to her nightmares, away from the here-and-now where she needed all her wits about her.
The bloke shakes his head and then looks over at the barmaid; they both share some kind of secret smile! And then the dog starts barking! A whippets howl fills the air. What the fuck! And then the bloke leans towards me and speaks directly into me eyes -
I have often felt alone out here. I suppose it is just part of my nature, part of who I have become in these last 50 years. Sometimes I am amazed at the wealth of love and friendship I have accrued around me and feel undeserving of accepting. It has really only been recently how much I know I am not alone, both in that wealth around me, but also my kinship with so many other misfits out there. Men who never fit in, or died trying, the ones hiding behind closed doors hating the world out here, or hiding in a haze of drugs and alcohol. God knows I have done all of that.
Oh, yes. Books constantly inspire me to be a better person and pursue my goals in an efficient way. Immediately rising to the top of the heap at the moment are Natalie Angier’s Woman, which really made me rethink aging in a female body and actually embrace it, and This Book is Overdue!, which made me seriously consider librarianship, to the point that if I attend grad school at all, it’ll be for library science. But every book inspires me in small ways, whether to be a better person or just never to write like that.
I used the same paw print flannel on her mask and glued it on with hotglue.
Also the hyperactivity and the attitude have been a real problem. That is a whole post in itself really.
"Maybe they were having an off night..."
I love the barn door inspired cabinets. I initially saw the idea while browsing Pinterest. Then clicked my way over to Lisa's blog, A Vintage Vine for all the details. I can't thank Lisa enough for the inspiration! She has such a beautiful blog. Her taste and her home are incredibly gorgeous!
I also bought the scarf they are all sitting on - a rather funky orange and yellow 70s number I picked up cheaply. Unfortunately it has a cigarette burn at one end, so if anyone has any suggestions as to how I could disguise it... I would be grateful.
By reaching toward the sky, from here, the ground.
I hope you all have a nice week!
Does that mean there's something wrong with me?
The free online magazine is focusing on Midwest Fly Fishing and is definately worth a browse. And you will notice that the image on the last page if you have wandered through our shop
Gotta go...I have to get up at 9:00AM tomorrow so that means I have to be in bed by 9:00PM tonight.
“I love you a million times more than Jesus loved the rest of humanity when he was on the cross…”
Next up is getting outside, because after five miles, the treadmill gets pretty boring.
Hair is a big deal.
Jackie Hayden of Hot Press magazine has mined a little nugget of gold here in band Lifeonland. We’ll be playing track 1 off their three track demo on the show today and really these guys are good. They could do with a little bit of tightening up but other than that they are a great prospect with an excellent if at times over exuberant guitarist and fantastic vocalist.
Annual File listing fee of £12 (2 years at £20)
before the election process here started. Google Obama and Odinga and see
Chick on her name above to see a photo of her last week.
Fill you decorating bags and get all your tips ready to decorate! With tip #233 on the blue frosting, begin piping the frosting around the outer edge of the cupcake. Continue until all but the mouth is covered. You can add more frosting if you want to build up his fur in certain areas, or to give him more of a shape.
I wanted a glass vase that would bring some colour into our bedroom, and I thought I could apply this technique to make a one of a kind vase that would match. I like how, when painted from the inside, there is no painting flaw, and it's nice and glossy.
If this experiment is successful, we hope there will be more Exchanges in the future! If you would like to make a suggestion, please email Tracey or Vivi; all suggestions will be taken into consideration.
I wasn't having any cramping, so I tried not to overreact and just laid back down to rest. It has gradually slowed throughout the afternoon, so that makes me feel a little better. My nurse and doctor called this afternoon after they received the actual ultrasound pics from Augusta. They said that I have a subchorionic hematoma in my uterus underneath the corner of the placentas that is probably the cause of the bleeding. It was described to me as a "cut" in my uterus from the placentas attaching that will hopefully eventually heal. There is nothing I did to cause this, nor is there anything I can do but rest. I don't need to aggravate it further since it can cause placental problems. Geez.
1 T coarsely chopped garlic
Stuart Holden: Sat on the sidelines this season with a prolonged injury the midfielder can still trade off promise and talent to make a move.
Sophie: Oh, life wouldn’t be worth living if you did that, David. You can be cautious, but you have to let people in.
The specific variety of rose I chose for our wedding was called a “Freedom Rose.” It was a gorgeous red color but especially paid tribute to both our patriotic dads, who each served in their respective state assemblies.
Well, they didn’t need to explain anymore. They just looked out at the dance floor. All I saw when I turned my head back to look at Pat, was Dancing Guy in the middle of a Toe-Touch…..Oh, look, now he is doing the Robot…Oh and another ToeTouch down into a split….Our mouths dropped open…..Silence…..and then we cracked up. I was laughing so hard I was crying in record time.
prosciutto
A big one. For some tasks such as removing wreckage, a prybay can be priceless. The typical cheaper ones have hexagonal shapes, but sometimes you can find better ones, I shaped, for slightly more money. I like the ones that have a 90º angle, or as close to it as possible, these you can sometimes hammer into places before levering. Little Tip: If you have a length of metal tube, it can be used along with the crowbar to get even more leverage force.
The visuals are dazzling. Filmed in the Ivory Coast’s Tai Forest, the movie gives us a sense of both the harshness and the grandeur of the primeval location. It took four years to film this and the resulting footage is worth every moment of hardship and danger (some of which was documented on First Look pre-show featurettes that screened in a number of movie theaters nationwide in March, hinting at an extensive home video extra features cache when the movie becomes available on DVD and Blu-Ray) that the crew endured to film in the remote location.
“What?! What do you mean?!”
I watched the boys’ faces glowing in the blue lights of their cell phones and sighed. As children I involved them to in storytelling, playing word games, atlas, talk about their various adventures, sing songs, make parodies, and do anything which would keep their minds off darkness and heat/cold. That is what I did as a child with my parents. In winters we would snuggle in a quilt munching peanuts, roasted gram or other rustic snack and a special kind of warm energy flowed through all of us keeping us close. These days it is rare that we get those cozy moments illuminated by candle lights. The art of storytelling is vanishing with the coming of modernism.
Now, when we wrote the script, we referred to the disc jockey, his character name was
Hi Heather! Thanks for participating in my first ever blogoversary!
Georgia next faces off against Florida at the O’Connell center on Wednesday night.
The wait for news won't be this long again, I promise!
Side note: People sometime ask us how we have 2
Short Description: Lloyd’s love for his business partner and friend, Thompson, waxes cold when seething envy creeps in. Envy soon metamorphoses to something meaner – an assassination plot, planned in a manner capable of fooling even a most intelligent FBI team! Nevertheless, Thompson’s home soon matures for the story of Daniel, his orphan nephew, eventually sent out of the home from Vivian Thompson’s unchecked libido.
Whether it's a curse, or a blessing, or an ability, the fact remains: whenever Roger is injured or in enough pain he crosses over to the land of the dead. Once there, there are rules: only the newly dead will talk, for example, and nothing will raise the longer dead from their tranquillity.
By: Jahanva devi
Moving, just keep moving
Nyanga bit veteran zookeeper Joe Ramonetha on the neck after security gates were left open while he was feeding her at the Johannesburg Zoo's breeding farm in Parys. He died before reaching a hospital. Various petitions and social media campaigns exhorted the zoo not to put the lioness down after the incident. As they became increasingly heated, the Jo'burg City Council took charge and refused to discuss her fate or release photos of the lioness.
A signed souvenir.
Thank you for reading my NEW POST! Come back because there will definitely be more!
Unlawful killings: Chairman of the Bloody Sunday Inquiry Lord Saville (C), pictured during the inquiry in Northern Ireland
It is the scars; hard work, tears, despair and a strong will to succeed. It is the vision of the finished product and its effect on audiences. However, someone has to take that vision as his or her own. Someone has to sweat the details and navigate the mire that translates written script into eye-popping visuals and heart-pumping suspense.
When beef in my presence
Don't forget to pop over to the Teddy Bo Challenge Blog and check out the fabulous creations by team B. You have until Sunday 4th March midnight GMT to enter the Swirls and pearls challenge.
I've had a couple of people asking about that Slow Cooker Rabbit Stew recipe. This is one of those really easy ones that come right out of your food storage. I like it because I can use either fresh vegetables in the summer or use my dehydrated veggies in the winter.
Along with finding some great books for a terrific price,
It's the first time I've used delta hops too, so I didn't know what to expect from them. I guess I could brew this one again to see if it was anything in the process that went awry, but fankly, life's too short. My brew notes from the day don't indicate any problems, although I did change my usual water treatment with this one, but only following an alkalinity test of the brewing liquor, so if anything, it should have improved the beer.
Tell me about your mystical room, in the comments!
Yes, I admit that life, all these past years have been very kind toward me, family, friends, loved ones, that made me to the person that I am right now.
Another wife, another family. They never knew you existed, you never knew they existed. It can't be true. It must be a mistake.It has to be her fault - all of it. Or: is it?
Pressure cooking
If I look at which needs Money Mastery and dancing at the Gilkinson’s Ball satisfy, I can see why each is important to me. Money Mastery gives me personal growth and a sense of belonging/connectedness. Both of those figure high on my list of importance. However, going to the ball also gives me belonging/connectedness, as well as variety and a huge sense of significance ( yes my ego enjoys being boosted; my dance card is full !). I feel torn that I may miss some of the seminar in order to feel the belonging and connectedness that getting ready for the ball gives me with my girlfriends, but I also feel I will be a ‘ party-pooper’ by leaving to go to bed instead of continuing on into the night with an after-party so that I can return to Money Mastery the next day to continue my personal growth.
I want to be Spero Lucas. Let’s just get that out of the way right here and now. Spero is the main character in George Pelecanos’ new novel, “The Cut.” Pelecanos is a writer of “The Wire” and “Treme” which need no new accolades here. Simply put, if you aren’t a fan of those shows, I’m not even sure why I’m friends with you.
“Velocity Micro has always had a cutting edge product lineup, frequently offering Intel’s latest processors to their enthusiast customers on launch day,” said CJ Bruno, Intel VP, GM Intel Americas. “We’re excited that Velocity Micro has continued that tradition by making the 3rd Gen Intel Core processors available in their industry-leading performance desktop offerings.”
as we both surrender
Today I talked to a counselor and made an appointment for me and the grrl.
NOON - nothing
This message comes at a time when I have felt supremely “put upon” by much of this planet’s “requirement” to “work for your survival”. I rather sense that many of us are feeling somewhat “sick and tired” of living in the midst of a system that has been established with the intent to keep us “in prison”. Of course we all have the ability to mold our own personal environment, but even so, SaLuSa’s statement, “keep positive and know that we come to release you all from your prison planet,” rings especially true with myself, at least in this moment.
Stephanie still clicked away at the computerupstairs
Children received extra tuition in story writing and were asked to write stories on the theme of The Most Magical Thing That Could Happen.
First of all, HAPPY BIRTHDAY Elizabeth. My sister celebrates her ___th birthday today (I don't know if she cares, but I don't want to get in trouble). I love you!!!
We are really enjoying visiting your creations, so keep them coming :)
I already told you I barely function before noon – did you really expect me to be a good parent at five o’clock in the morning?? But don’t worry, I made a mental note to give the ‘don’t judge a book by its cover’ speech later on… once we stopped laughing.
The cogito is the line between fantasy and reality. On one side of the cogito is a universe of beliefs and ideas and theories. To cross the line is to leave all that behind. No theory, concept, belief, opinion or debate can have any possible basis in reality once the ramifications of the cogito have fully saturated the mind. No dialogue can take place across that line because nothing that makes sense on either side makes sense on the other. We all think we know what the cogito means; this is an invitation to challenge that assumption. If professors of philosophy truly understood it, they wouldn’t be professors of philosophy. Alfred North Whitehead said that all philosophy is a footnote to Plato, but all philosophy, Plato included, is rendered obsolete and irrelevant by Descartes. Nothing but the subjective I Am is true, so what’s the point of prattling on?
George Jones - The Essential George Jones: The Spirit Of Country - 2001
A good two top, a bottle or two of wine, and a tasting menu are perfection in my book.
2 composed
And the celebrity chef clearly plans to spend a lot more time there after forking out a staggering £4.3m for the five-bedroom family home, near his friends David and Victoria Beckham.
Obama has said not one word in opposition to capitalism. When faced with a choice between nationalizing industries to rescue them, and any other choice, he has in every case avoided nationalization. The government is a stockholder in some rescued companies, but not the sole owner. Obama has chosen free market solutions to tough problems where other free-enterprise nations did not.
"You be quiet!"
Moving on. For the base, I simply took my fabric to the craft store and chose a coordinating color from the row of $1 acrylic paints. After brushing on a few coats, I sprayed it with a high-gloss finish. Then I cut the fabric to size and stapled it to the underneath, folding the corners like a package. (No foam or batting needed since this is a foot stool.)
by J.Cano/A.Checa
Countries which offer the greatest benefits for expat children in aspects such as settling in to their new country, general health and standards of childcare are less likely to be able to deliver economic advantages such as greater overall wealth, disposable income, and luxuries.
LIFE MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATION
The above picture is of the bookshop-in-a-greenhouse at the Wapping Project on a summer evening, when they have outdoor film screenings. Miha Mazzini, author of The German Lottery,* will be reading there on Thursday, 5 April. Miha is a film-maker as well as a novelist, and because he has more faith in the English weather than I do he’ll be bringing some of his short films.
Heat large nonstick skillet over medium heat until it is hot enough for a spritz of water to sizzle.
Newhaven. It's quite a pleasant name, isn't it? I can imagine Newhaven as a cosy little seaside town in New England; all white painted, weatherboarded houses with paling fences; a couple of bearded old salts mending their nets on the quay, spinning yarns for the tourists; sand dunes sloping lazily down to the sea; the smell of freshly cooked lobsters...
(I had promised her in the past that I wouldn’t blog about any personal stuff of hers, so I’m just keeping to the bare facts here as they relate to our family propensity for not maintaining verticality.)
SATURDAY MORNING OATMEAL (serves 2 hungry people)
Truvia is a great little sweetener that is zero calories, 100% natural and tastes great. I use it in a lot if my cooking especially desserts. The interesting thing I have found is that when I prepare sweet stuff for others and substitute the sugar with Truvia – no one seems to notice.
Before signing the Declaration, Alarcon and Gonzalez underlined the atmosphere of fraternity and responsibility, open dialogue about dissimilar matters of bilateral interest, and the high level of coincidence in fundamental questions achieved at this meeting.
Oh, and happy Easter!
According to Paul 'Willo' Williams the author of 'You're Wondering Now - The Specials From Conception To Reunion' and a 2-Tone expert, the image of Eaton on The Selecter's album cover is a universal symbol for 2-Tone, "Steve will always be remembered simply for his iconic pose on the front cover of The Selelcter's Too Much pressure album. That image has been as much used around the world as Walt Jabsco himself. He was without a doubt , the worlds best dressed man who had plenty of time for everybody. He will be missed by many."
He turned 14 years old yesterday and I'm not sure how that happened.
KEITEL WA, CATE TR, COUCH RB. Efficacy of sequential annual vaccination with inactivated influenza virus vaccine. Am J Epidemiol 1988; 127: 353-364.
And, of course, some of the best potential candidates look elsewhere from the get-go.
It's tempting to describe the different genres of seventies rock in broad strokes - prog (widdly-wanky-woo), glam (thump, crunch, yeah!), hard rock (devils, witches, blues guitar, screeches and wails) and art rock (synthesisers squelch, vocals brood and yearn, unexpected ambient interludes). In reality, the scene was rather more confused and disorientated than that, and elements of any of these noises tended to make themselves present in many discs. The Sweet, for example, loved to play around with hard rock on B-sides when they got the chance, and the line between art rock and prog rock was often blurred - lest we forget, Davy O'List of The Nice was in the early line-up of Roxy Music.
She could hardly have allowed herself to be any more naked for me, could hardly have left herself more stripped and exposed.
A great big thank you to those who helped, donated and SHOPPED!
But what happens in the case where a ‘bad baby-sitter’ is accidentally hired to take care of good children of good parents? Now, we are talking: ‘Danger!’
And so we ended our day driving thru the country side where out of the blue the Devils Tower appears in the landscape. We set up our tent and enjoyed a beer outside the majesty of the inside of the volcano... and of course every night the KOA there plays Close Encounters, it was out of this world... hahah.
The Medium Stackable Storage Boxes come in a set of four and measure 10-3/8 by 12-3/4 by 16-1/4 inches (H x W x D).
People often ask me how long it takes to write a book. The answer is that it depends on what you mean. It took me fourteen months to write this current draft, which currently runs about 126,000 words or about 400 pages. I think it'll take another year to revise it sufficiently so I can show it to people in the publishing industry. This draft took a while to write, because I was doing research every step of the way, even though I'd done a lot of my initial reading back in 2003, and had been able to lay out a pretty decent outline for the story at that time. (I was able to use quite a bit of my old outline, thought it shifted a lot.)
“Wow, you people are sooo quick to make up rumours! Me & Harry went for coffee together as we haven’t seen each other since last year!” Ellis retorted “We’re only good friends and have been since high school. I have a lovely boyfriend called Phil so you can stop spreading rumours about me and Harry dating each other because we absolutely are not!”
Due to the congestion in all flash users and removal
This morning this sweet little box arrived at my door.......
We have kept in touch over the holidays about everything and just spoke on the phone tonight! Have I mentioned that I can really tell this is going to be a great experience! Not only will I be attending a PTA dinner auction at the end of January, but I get to experience my first day of planning with the other second grade teachers next Friday (after a week of quarterly testing).
"gah-vahl-DOHN"
So there you have it for today! I'd better get busy! I have 11 more ticket boxes to make for my granddaughter, Morgan's 'Deaf Social' at Kent State on Friday ... as well as another 20 thank you cards. Yikes ... I'd better get crackin'! Have a wonderful day!
* Mayo Clinic College of Medicine (USA)
She is nervous
-Cobras
That's all for now. I have some other projects I've made for Craft Test Dummies that I still need to show you...later this week!
T: Oh this is bad. surprise visits are never a good look. Also, a lot of hype for a 9/10 pants girl, just sayin'.
Yes, it's going to take time to get this right, and time is something precious to many of us. But we all know quality takes time and practice makes perfect. There really is no cheating on this stuff. Well actually learning all this from me is kind of cheating! I'm happy to pass on what I know, and I've learned a few things myself just from doing this. It's taken me over a week to compile all this, but the driving force is to help you become better photographers and online merchants.
Wendy and Bonnie- The Paisley Windowpane
9. Agirretxe (Real Sociedad): Age: 25 Gls: 10 – WGR: 1.20
Now, I don’t follow this artist at all and I don’t know what her intentions were in writing this song. So, I am not judging her motives. She may mean very well. But the lyrics of this song really repulse me. This is not because her song is vulgar or crude. It’s because the entire song is very confusing if she is talking about God, which she supposedly is, because the words seem better fitted as directed towards her boyfirend or husband (if she has one). In fact one would be hard-pressed to show from a proper theology of God how she is even referring to Him in this song. It would certainly be a stretch. The fact is, apart from a couple slight insertions of the word “Lord,” I highly doubt the average person on the street if hearing this song would have any idea Jamie Grace is even singing about God. That bothers me immensely.
The story I have to tell here would have been of scant interest to Barney, but was not unimportant to me. It involves my relationship with a young woman, still alive today, whom I will refer to only by her nickname, Linky, sometimes abbreviated as Link.
I was just about as beside myself as she was, literally, standing beside herself, to run into a fellow Cincinnati Survivor in the Big Apple.
Over at the Beyond Ex-Gay site, you can now take a quick survey about your experiences. You can take it anonymously if you wish. I just took the survey myself last night, and found it easy to navigate and refreshingly freeing. Below is a description of the survey.
The shortest one-sentence summary I've ever seen is the
My daughter (7) has been dancing since the beginning of the year.
We will probably attack the month of January, with all our new resolutions tucked firmly under our arms, with all the gusto that we could possibly muster. But over time, as our stupid little brains start thinking “Bloody hell, this is hard work!” our steely reserve will start to falter, and one by one, these resolutions will fall by the wayside. But is that such a bad thing? Should we really beat ourselves up over it?
Getting up at 5am sucks ass.
Because that’s what all this “fair use” crap is about, of course. The policies are full of bull like “We’ll monitor how much you send and receive each calendar month so that we can protect our network for all our customers”. But what it all means is that T-Mobile can try to guarantee all of their customers a little internet access at the expense of those who need to use the internet a lot.
Thursday night in West London, some people stay in and watch TV, others go to the pub, some just work through the night but the music lovers head to the Notting Hill Arts club for their infamous Thursday night YoYo’s. On the bill is new Warner signee Smiler.
No, I'm sorry, but this is not the same as anything seen before. Hold onto the example of Watergate: a third rate burglary, under a constant media spotlight, leading to the end of a presidency, and an attorney general in prison. Compare that to Operation Fast And Furious: a covert policy of mass murder for political benefit, followed by feeble congressional investigations, with exactly zero elite media interest. It is an objective metric to compare Watergate to Fast And Furious. The current lack of accountability leaves the Obama administration emboldened to move further away from adherence to the Constitutional limitations they swore to uphold. "If the Congress won't act, I will," may be translated in normal English as, "The hell with the Constitution, I am in charge, and nobody can stop me."
to the accountant
Ok, well, it's not really me only, but my picture (from the about me, facebook, twitter...) is the one linked with the story.
"Teachers are puzzling out what a civic conscience means," reports Christine Brabant, researcher in the department of Education at Sherbrooke University in Quebec.
7. Even if you are in pain or struggling, that is still LIVING!
It really felt like everything went pretty much like clockwork. I went first, the shooting vehicles that posed a threat to me were suppressed, and the transports that carried his heavy hitters were slowed down. I was more mobile than him and was able to keep him at arm’s reach (having lots of 48″ guns is great.)
A million darkened kitchens,
It is fun and rare to say that I went on a “field trip” while in college, but I did go on one last week. Everyone was packed in two vans. I had some good conversations while on the road, and got to know classmates and future internship team members better.
Since the women couldn’t afford to buy tractors on their own, Leticia organized them in groups to take out loans and buy collectively. And those women went out and trained other women. To date, Brenyah, her 10 PALMS employees, and scores of volunteers have trained 250,000 women in five of the 10 regions in Ghana – and they’re planning on reaching 250,000 more with the award of $300,000 in the 2010 Exxon Women, Tools & Technology challenge.
Lilly: Or else he's working an angle. If he's not stealing a little, he's stealing a lot.
Shapes your butt and thighs
Fortunately, I gave the Guest Bath a makeover this summer, so all it required was some Christmas cheer! I took this as an opportunity to get my craft on....Stenciled Hand Towels!
Written by: John Newton
I am all wrapped up really bad, in Cupids stings.
All of this is one less thing that I have to get angry about, because other people are doing it for me. All of this is progress. Why can’t I see this same rate of progress in my country? Why don’t more people care about what Americans are doing to other Americans? Why don’t we see that our future is in the growing numbers of people who come here from somewhere or else? It’s a sad day when a conservative religious institution with a clear history of discrimination is outpacing government in terms of change. I’m not saying the Mormon church is changing in all the ways I wish it would, but it’s getting there on the issue of race and immigration, while the rest of the country seems to be moving backward. This would make me mad, but really it just makes me tired.
During this meeting, the undercover agents gave Hassoun a digital camcorder to videotape potential targets. Hassoun traveled to the area around Wrigley Field and filmed potential targets on August 8, 12, and 14, 2010, focusing on the bars, restaurants, and potential security in the area. As he filmed, Hassoun commented on the potential tactical advantages and risks of perpetrating at attack at the various locations he observed. Also during the July 21 meeting, Hassoun asked the undercover agents effectively to employ him planning the bombing, and from July 21 to September 18, 2010, they paid Hassoun $2,700.
Peeved: No, Smalls, I think they’d like purses better.
There are also details of how Gandolfini handed out cash gifts of $33,000 to all the regular cast members from his own money after winning a huge salary increase.
with all those people around
Vampires Suck is the story of an emo girl, Becca Crane (Jenn Proske), and her love affair with the vampire, Edward Sullen (Matt Lanter – Star Wars: The Clone Wars, Disaster Movie). In Twilight, the obvious battle is whether Bella will choose the vampire Edward or the werewolf Jacob as her lover; that is not really a dilemma in Vampires Suck, which leaves me scratching my head. How does a Twilight parody leave out that the Bella character is torn between two lovers? In Vampires Suck, Becca presumably has a relationship with Edward Sullen, though this is never actually shown, and instead, is implied. Edward decides to leave Becca for her own safety, but when he fears she might be dead, he decides to expose himself as a vampire, which will get him killed by the elder vampires. Again, anyone who hasn’t seen Twilight will find it near impossible to follow this plot.
July 1776 -
Maestro Giulini used the Leopold Nowak edition of this 1890
Side A: With some dreamy vocals and lyrics, this track hits the title of this release home; it’s hints at an old time love song of sorts. It kind of reminds me of Guster in a way, but a little more on the driving indie rock side of things… it’s difficult to pinpoint who this reminds me of exactly. The track is instantly likable, mixing tried and true elements of the genre alongside some components of pop, psyche and maybe a hint of jangle. It’s a fresh spin on more accessible indie. The lyrics are sure to get stuck in your head.
On the Seattle Tilth Facebook page I found a really interesting link to an article on keeping Mason Bees. It's suggested that the bee house is hung at head height to be able to watch their activity which makes this a fun thing to do if you have kids.
The most northern of these routes and the least direct — Jamaica Pass — was sorely undermanned, the British learned, and so Howe sent through thousands of British soldiers augmented by Hessian mercenaries in what military historians like to call a “brilliant flanking maneuver.” The battle climaxed at the Vechte-Cortelyou house, today a museum and cultural center known as the Old Stone House at present day Fifth Avenue and Third Street in Park Slope.
Repeated exposure to anything changes perception, and halfway through my third winter here I'm a lot less judgmental on other peoples' choices to wear a fur coat than I used to be. Suddenly, the sort of comment a visitor to this city made to an acquaintance of mine on learning that the fur coat the latter was wearing was the real McCoy — “You should be ashamed of yourself!” — starts to sound not only incredibly rude but also more than a little blinkered. Live through a Russian winter yourself before judging other people's ways of staying warm, would be my advice to any new arrivals.
Film- Porali
If you have a few minutes, check out the 2011 Five in the Next Five Years videos on YouTube (links below). But, if you don’t have time to watch them right now, I have noted a key point from each:
We then see Roy at his apartment putting money back into one of his clown paintings, when someone knocks at the door. He rehangs the painting and finds it's Myra knocking. She's bursting to tell him that one of her contacts has found a guy in Tulsa who's "made for them." as well as an office set up that's all ready to go. She tells him that she can come up with $10,000.00 if she tries, which means he needs to come up with $20,000.00. Roy questions whether he has that kind of money and tells her "Maybe I like it where I am." Myra says "Maybe, I don't. I had ten good years with Cole and I want 'em back.I gotta have a partner..."
I’m not ready to delve into the recent emotional changes in my life publicly yet so; here is a quick and dirty (in so many ways) for you guys. Yesterday, I watched a film that a friend highly recommended to me. The movie is a twisted and dark yet humorous tale about love called Secretary. The main character is a young self-hating woman who finds a way to channel her non-typical emotional needs into more healthy behavior. The actress who played this part was Maggie Gyllenhall, the girlfriend of Spiderman in those movies. James Spader played the egomaniacal Dom, and played it scarily well.
In 1951, the City of Chicago enacted what was called the 'barmaid ordinance.' It prohibited women from "pouring, mixing, or drawing intoxicating liquors" unless they owned the tavern or were related as wife, sister, or mother to the owner. Chicago wasn't unique. The article mentions a similar law in Michigan.
3 variants
In a separate bowl mix bread crumbs and salt.
Perfume ads, beer billboards, movie posters: everywhere you look, women’s sexualized bodies are on display. A new study published in Psychological Science, a journal of the Association for Psychological Science, finds that both men and women see images of sexy women’s bodies as objects, while they see sexy-looking men as people.
Last week we saw Jesus the prophet – engaging in prophetic action AND prophesying his terrible death.
I want to ask David Cameron...
Spread the joy =)
The Last Play at Shea is one of the better documentaries I have seen. It does not just give an interesting and informative look at New York City, Billy Joel, and Shea Stadium, but can captivate and inspire its viewers. This is a love letter to the blue-collar class, and Billy Joel fans everywhere. New Yorkers will feel a special kind of connection to the material, I am sure, but the rest of us can enjoy The Last Play at Shea just as easily. Paul Crowder has hit this documentary out of the ballpark.
3.stress
I'm sitting here, New Years Eve, relaxing by the crackling fireplace with a glass of wine (oops...it's empty...brb) and my laptop. I don't know that life gets any more relaxing. Tammy has been in the office all afternoon and evening taking calls from people in search of medical assistance, sussing out their needs and coordinating any required help. Our most mild and brown winter is going to have a new look when we wake up in the morning as snow is falling heavily. I'm ok with that. I've got a new snowblower that is itching to show me what it can do as well as my Mukluk. They both thrive on snow. I'm becoming more accepting of it.
1tsp Fennel seeds
4. Dead To You is in stores now. Unwanteds book 2 comes out in September.
If this is all true, as the LA police strongly suspect, we may wonder why it has taken over half a century to apprehend this man, as his album full of mug shots show us, he has been arrested many times during a lengthy criminal career, yet it seems he may have been able to pursue his grisly and violent hobby unhindered, possibly since the middle of Eisenhower's first term.
We would like to give a big “Shout Out” to Julie Parsons at EasyStreet Realty in Charlotte, NC for selling the most Accent Homes in 2011. Julie, thank you for bringing your clients to Accent Homes’ Communities and helping them purchase their dream home!
The cultural discrepancies didn’t stop there. What we Britons crave – large plots of land, regardless of quality and gradient, spacious houses and rooms, internal staircases, period features, exposed beams and open fireplaces – would make a villager recoil in horror at the needlessly expensive upkeep, wasteful heating and utter pointlessness.
1. They have a strong sense of femininity and idea of what it means to be a woman. Chinese women tend to dress quite feminine. They wear dresses and high heels even to mundane occasions and like to look pretty,. They keep their nails done and hair beautifully styled. They care about their appearance and the way the world sees them. They know the importance of having face.
-My mom was talking to her sister, my Aunt Vicki, who lives in New Hampshire. Aunt Vicki was saying how sad it was we live so far away, because they have a tractor that’s just been sitting at her father-in-law’s place for 8 years, since they sold their acreage. Mom told us about it in passing, thinking there was no way we could get it. But she didn’t factor in that paying for gas and such to drive out to go get a free tractor is still several thousand dollars cheaper than any of the reasonably priced tractors we’ve found so far.
Talking of crushes, I don't know why it took me so long to realise that nineties era Laura Dern is well hot. The characters are all beloved to me. I even like the children, and I hate most Spielberg movie children. Wayne Knight is brilliantly slimy as Dennis Nedry (my second favourite character, behind Doctor Malcolm). Jurassic Park harkens back to an era in filmmaking where Samuel L Jackson could die an offscreen death (with hair, no less) and blockbusters were fun. I half expected to leave the cinema and walk out into nineties Birmingham.
“Without the girdle I feel dominant—invincible! But I don’t feel cruel and wicked as I used to—the Amazons transformed me! I love Wonder Woman and Queen Hippolyte—I can’t bear to have them hurt—I must save them!”
Inspired by their 35th Anniversary DVD “There’s Know Place Like Home,” in 2010 KANSAS began their ‘Collegiate Symphony Tour’ performing their hits accompanied by various college and university symphonies throughout the United States to help raise funds and awareness for collegiate music programs. In 2011, this tour lead to a special collaboration with the US Army Orchestra culminating in the ‘Carry On Concert’ honoring America’s veterans on Veteran’s Day 11/11/11 at DAR Constitution Hall in Washington, DC.
Each one has a button hole so that it can be hung from any hook and with a variety of embellished flower decorations on the front.
Yesterday I greeted my day off bright and early and ready to do some work on a vintage room screen we had purchased a few weeks ago. Stepping out on to the car port I was faced with a disorganized mess. Well, this simply wouldn't do to work in. So, I spent the next hour cleaning and organizing the car port. When I was ready to begin work I stepped up onto the back porch / laundry cemetery and realized this space too needed cleaning badly. This room is screened in on one side and windowed in on another, with no screen door to keep the bugs out it can get pretty filthy.
Kansas City, Missouri, USA
Though it is a lot of work, my little girl is still small enough not
Only problem is, those things are difficult to carry on the bike without making a mess, and it's also hard to get enough calories out of them on longer rides. Watching some of my riding partners squeeze gels into their mouths, take pills, and mix powders into their drinking water, I am beginning to understand why that sort of thing is done. Still, I am extremely reluctant to go that route and I am highly suspicious of nutritional supplements with mysterious, "scientifically-formulated" ingredients. Mostly that is because I have to be cautious with my diet for health reasons, and many of these supplement mixtures, even if they are "all natural," have ingredients that can affect hormone levels. I simply do not know what a large concentration of, say, soy or whey protein will do to my system, and I am reluctant to experiment. That is why I've been staring at, but still haven't opened this enormous bottle of electrolyte powder I've been sent to try. The last and only time I had an electrolyte drink, my high school tennis coach fed it to me and I promptly passed out. Understandably, I am reluctant to try one again.
Snuggled next to Penny and
In an exposé of international firms that were assisting the former Libyan regime, The Wall Street Journal this week fingered VASTech SA Pty Ltd, a small South African firm.
- Focusing and bodily sensing can awaken early memories and experiences.
The Sanhedrin wants to put the apostles to death, despite the fact that they lacked the authority to do so under Roman occupation. Who is it that restores sanity to the Sanhedrin? What argument does he use to convince the Sanhedrin to let the apostles go?
Includes 6 second record and playback.
Mya god bless you
America desperately needs to elect a grownup. It needs a man who knows how to read a balance sheet and how to restore the economy.
Therapy kind of set me off on the wrong foot...right foot?...emotional foot.
Stamp - Thank You
My grandmother's later years were not so good--she withdrew from the world into depression and resentment after her forced retirement in the mid-1970s. My mom and I are still dealing with the fallout of those years--I know I spent at least two sessions with a therapist trying to come to terms with it. But I think I would have liked to have known her in her prime. I like to imagine the 38-year-old Mary Alice sitting down with the 38-year-old Bookhart (me) over drinks and hashing things out.
All in all, by the time I was done, I had gone to a dozen different psychologists, psychiatrists and priests to cure my ills. Well, I’m still fucked up and two doctors and one priest quit their professions, which I’m sure they spent a lot of time and effort on, after meeting me. I used to take pride in that fact. After all, I had won, at the time. In retrospect, I’m not sure anyone won that battle.
My husband and I began the process of have this little one come and live in our family and we are hoping the baby will join us early in the new year. We had no baby things. Our youngest is four and we gave everything away. But people have been good and so much has already been given to us.
if we don’t get hurt … we’ll never gain
Now why did I say two of three Mother games are already ready and able to be ported to VC in weeks? Well as awesome as it is that Mother 3 was translated it was done so without consent. Nintendo was nice enough not to stop the project which they could have done. Nintendo’s choice to not put down the Mother 3 localization shows their unofficial support of their fans. However Nintendo could not use the fan based localization for multiple reasons. The first it would involve Nintendo conceding to the demands of a fan boys showing if you push hard enough Nintendo will cave. The second it would mean paying a group that hacked your hardware and software that encouraged the sale of Flash cartridges something that Nintendo absolutely deplores. The third would be giving in direct support to other groups to bring it upon themselves to localize Nintendo’s products with no quality or content controls in place. In other words Nintendo could not use the fan localized version.
pepper/ float in light/ pours salt into her palm and sprinkles/ as her father sprinkled holy water on her newborn’s head.” Reading Patricia Lee Lewis we learn to appreciate the simplest daily tasks. She makes such duties magical.
How this happens I think is different for everyone, but the way I see it is we think of Peter Pan. Think of a happy little thought from your childhood. Embrace it, visualize it, create it in your mind. Then release it in your desired artistic form. That feeling needs to be in your work.
In early February, Dompok revealed that the Cabinet had agreed to form the RCI.
The workshop theme is: COMING TOGETHER TO RESTORE CAPE COD COASTAL WATERS IN NEW WAYS
“I could have forgiven it if he’d fallen desperately in love with someone and gone off with her. I should have thought that natural. I shouldn’t really have blamed him. I should have thought he was led away. Men are so weak, and women are so unscrupulous.”
Marigold Petite Mix 4.26.12
Alone in the Dark: Lynsey
The border on the left and bottom is actually from a sheet of paper meant to cover text books. I bought a bunch of them at Target on clearance for .20 and then colored it in using the same color palette as the self portrait.
Love is the most important and powerful force in the universe. Our main goal should be to love God. Loving and taking care of others, ourselves, and our planet are ways of expressing our love for God.
Virulent racism
Essie Playa del Platinum! Side by side Skull and Glossbones is a bit darker, but the colour is so close to being the same. I don't think anyone would ever notice the difference, so I would say if you have one you can skip the other.
where is my mind?- the pixies
“How far out do you suppose it was?” He leaned forward and scrunched up his eyes. Seeing through the smoke and dust was impossible.
I started with a card base of SU Pool Party and layered with a springy floral patterned paper from the Authentique Delightful 6x6 pad. My cute image is Maya's Balloons from Mo's Digital Pencil. You can find her in Mo's store here. I printed her on Cryogen White and colored her with my Copics. I added a bit of Stickles to her shoes and the flowers on her little outfit. The sentiment is from Paulette at Create With TLC. I added a little satin bow and that was it.
Men are usually lucky when it comes to achieving orgasm – wind it up, and it will go. But not all women have quite such an easy time of it. The vast majority of us can reach clitoral orgasm with sufficient stimulation and arousal, but climaxing through penetrative sex isn’t actually all that common. Scientists have argued for years over whether women even have a ‘G-spot’. I think we do (I know I do…), but I’m not sure how much of its existence is physical, or more emotional.
My least favorite stories were (surprisingly) Dorothy Allison's, which wasn't just about one friend, but various friends and lovers, and didn't have the type of focus I was looking for in this anthology, though it had some beautiful writing - Patricia Marx's, which was too short and too vague, too much like an outline of a friendship without the characters and details - and, I'm sort of embarassed to say, but Jennifer Gilmore's "The Kindness of Strangers" was very hard for me to read. It's about Jennifer as a twenty-something who has to have her colon removed, and her rancorous and jealous thoughts. I'm sure the story was therapuetic for Gilmore to write, but after reading about how miserable her life was, I was hoping for some sort of redemption. Even a cheesy epilog would have helped. Because each of these stories has such a sad ending (except for Nuar Alsadir, whose "friend" really needed to get lost), and Gilmore's illness was so grueling, I felt like the anthology needed to end on a somewhat happy note.
I'm not sure who on the sideline will take the blame at this point, but there is talent oozing out their ears and they don't know what to do with it come game day.
Still love to watch kids' movies. And I can't wait to make Henry watch my favourites.
Anyway, before I crack on with all the jobs I have to do before they descend upon me (there'll be no housework done for the rest of the week either ........... I don't multi task anymore, lol) I just wanted to share a couple of cards I made recently.
That was rough. I had just had this catastrophic season at the Brooklyn Academy of Music that all but ended my stage career in New York. It took years to put it back together. There are still great areas of New York theater where I can’t seem to get in the door. I did three plays in a row and got slammed mercilessly, so all of a sudden I couldn’t get auditions in theaters in New York. I was a wreck – and then I got this call about The Muppet Movie. But the director I think was having a really difficult time on the film. And then a year later it comes out and it’s this sweet little movie. I thought, “I can’t believe this movie has come out of that set.” But it reunited me with Charlie Durning – almost all my scenes were with him. He’d been in Fiddler on the Roof on the road, but then his part was cut. But we got to know each other really well when we were in Detroit with Fiddler. Now I was being reunited with him and that was great. We would do these all-night shoots on the studio lot, where I’m driving him around, and we would just catch up on our lives.
This is the person that screams in horror films. They say “OH MY GOD!” or “DIOS!” or “I CAN’T WATCH!” when there is a tense and suspenseful scene. They laugh way too hard during funny scenes (they’re all “THAT’S HILARIOUS!”). They say “YES!” really loud when something triumphant transpires. They might even say “OH NO!” as something bad is happening or “I DON’T BELIEVE IT!” when a sad scene arises. The worst ones actually try and talk to the characters on screen, in the hopes that the movie is actually some sort of interactive Choose Your Own Adventure, that the projectionist can and will swap in different rolls of film depending on the reactions of the crowd... “DON’T OPEN THE DOOR!”
Wow, sorry it's been a week since my last post - I have been crafting & will try and get my creations on line during the course of the week.
I researched Rocky Horror as much as I could using a fancy tool known as the "World Wide Web." The movie, I found out, was known for midnight showings with a ragtag cast and audience members who would dress up and shout at the screen and throw hot dogs at Frank N. Furter.
And though it may lead into darkness of night
The passage is rich in explanation and challenge. Just a couple of key points today:
Colored in with Spectrum Noirs I forgot to write down colors :( but I think I used
Get response from friend – Digging out too, no worries. And I had none. I brush the snow off the windshield, feel the fine powdery flecks so cool on my cheeks. My hair is covered in snow, I see in the window, and laugh at my image. I shake off, get in van, and head to rehearsal feeling high on life – I did it! I beat depression again today!
Women are of course as varied, unique and complicated as any other creature on this planet, but for today’s purposes, I plan to explore four levels of women.
Our eyes, and those of most other terrestrial vertebrates, exploit this effect by having bulging, rounded corneas and a layer of liquid (the aqueous humour) in front of the pupil. Remember that the whole point of an eye is to bend incoming light to form a tiny image on the retina. Because their refractive index differs from that of air, the cornea and aqueous humour bend light that enters the eye, pre-focusing an image before it reaches the lens. This greatly increases an eye’s ability to focus – its optical power – because the light can be bent first at the surface of the eye, and again at the lens. In humans the cornea accounts for about two thirds of the eye’s optical power, and the lens accounts for the remaining third.
In general, I am not a huge fan of love triangles, but this one did not bother me really. Cassia is not choosing between Xander and Ky. She is choosing between what the Society says is good for her and what she wants for herself. Cassia never would have chosen Xander, but for the Society telling her to. She loves Xander as a friend and doesn’t seem all that eager to have to change this attitude to a more romantic one, once she discovers she has feelings for Ky. So really, I didn’t think this was much of a love triangle. Cassia worries about hurting Xander’s feelings, but she doesn’t really angst on about her feelings for him (or if she did I tuned it out).
That leads to very slow progress. And I, personally, am starting to get a bit itchy to hit level 20.
These two events have put us into a different potential world. We are now in a heart-based energy field; when you connect to it, a new possibility opens up. This means that our spiritual acceleration will quicken dramatically—there is nothing left to stop it.
Not the number of alcoholic units consumed that day, but my final destination, arriving at Harrisons just as they were about to close earlier than planned, based on a slow day. I remarked to Barraharri that I had been puzzled all day to see pubs closed, even ones that would normally open on both a Sunday and a Friday (in case they were mysteriously applying often less helpful Sunday hours). Although this was frustrating, perhaps the lack of customers anticipated by the closed venues was the experience of those that opened?
By twilight, there was nothing left to show for the storm, except what little water that was still trapped on the deck and a few cirrus that distorted the first stars of the night. The storm was over, leaving nothing but memories, which are still vivid after the passage of almost 40 years. It was a hell of a storm. I haven't seen one like it since that evening.
I'm delighted to have been asked to write a guest post on a new website called multi-story.co.uk (link at end, please read on). It's aimed at short fiction writers (although no height limit is specified, haha, joke) and runs competitions. I'm not known as a flash fiction / short story writer myself, but a couple of my blog posts provoked the site owners into contacting me. They'd also read and enjoyed Peril and gave me some coverage (hopefully I'll get the same for The Baptist!)
This closet soon turns out to be more than your usual closet. It is in fact a door to a land full of mythological creatures. I have not had a chance to read the Bible yet but I am very much looking forward to reading about fauns and talking animals and all of these other magical biblical creatures. The girl who first enters this magical land, called Narnia, meets a very nice faun carrying an umbrella who invites her to his house but makes her promise not to tell anyone. It reminded me of a special friendship I once had when I was young with an older man carying an umbrella who also made me promise not to tell anyone.
Oh, don't get me wrong, all of our homes have been wonderful.
Bake for at least 60-90 minutes or until light brown and crisp looking on top. If making ahead, remove from oven before it is too browned (about 1 hour) and bake for at least 30 minutes on the day of serving. If you make the little extra casserole, it will be done after 45-60 minutes.
Fireworks: Launch Green Fireworks
Get to know your local bookstore and the booksellers. Don't be stalker-ish, though.
“It’s very difficult that he would survive, I would suggest that you make it easy on him and allow us to kill him.”
of loans and set up effective
please don’t forget who I was and am,
Of course this reminds me of the Zen proverb- "Let go over a cliff, die completely, and then come back to life. After that you cannot be deceived."
Photographer: The Amazing “Aleida Rhode”
While Barley is drunkenly chatting with "Gravey" in the bar, Merridew introduces himself to him as a Commercial Second Secretary from the Embassy, telling him, "We've received a rather pressing telegram for you over our link. We think you should pop round and read it straight away. Would you mind.?" Then Merridew cups his hand over his head - as if to straighten his hair - which alarms Barley; as le Carre puts it, "this large gesture, performed by a fat man in a low room, seemed to raise fears in Barley that might otherwise have slumbered, for he became disconcertingly sober."
I’m still wrestling with refining the plot of Advent Chronicles down into chunks that can actually be written (using a loose variation on the Snowflake Method), and still repeatedly badgering my dear friends/walking reference libraries Shoi and G. for more information, and still compulsively buying books about crime in 1920s New York and then somewhat undermining my stringent research attempts by not reading them.
+ Food
Their round proportion embracing all.
The two of us stood there for a little while gazing out over the water until one of the rods started to twitch, we'd finally got a bite.
1197 ***D-X/7(C)/1994. “The Fate of the Jews in Greece and Italy During the Second World War.” Conference on the Holocaust in Southern Europe, National Italian-American Foundation, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-8, above, pp. 49-58 (1997), and in Item B-11, above, pp. 71-80 (1999).) See Item. C-1995(1), above, and Item C-1997(8), above, pp. 481-88.
½ cup plain flour, sifted
1.An information session regarding IVF.
And we won’t ask each other about anyone else. During the break, we’re free to see whoever we want. So there will be none of that “We were on a break!” confusion a la Ross and Rachel. We’re just going to play it by ear for now and see where that takes us. Because we are still in love, even if we’re a little confused right now, and when you’re really in love, you can’t just cut each other out of your lives forever. At least, I can’t. And NYC claimed it couldn’t either, so I’m going to choose to believe that for now.
18. Let Me In
It’s true that the Frenchman did a terrible job by any standards. When Liverpool cashed in to the tune of £50 million, by selling Fernando Torres to Chelsea during last season’s transfer window, Comolli set about spending the loot with all the restraint and foresight of a drunken sailor.
He was the best dancer from night 1, when nobody knew who he was. He had some seriously memorable dances, including his Freestyle that might have given him the final edge in voting.
24. My mother taught me: WISDOM …
The prophet, Habakkuk, wasn’t like most of the other Old Testament prophets, who delivered messages from God. Instead, much of what Habakkuk wrote is full of questions for God, just as Mary and Martha asked questions of Jesus. In his brief book, Habakkuk asked:
You didn't honestly expect me to write up this list without a mention of one of the sturdiest, best-selling ultralight rods of all time, did you? My relationship with Ugly Stik goes back about 16 years, when my Dad gave me one (casting rod, medium/fast) as a reward for living to age 22, or not failing out of college, or not getting some girl pregnant, or something. I still have it, too, and actually fished it last year! (thanks, Dad!)
The Treasury Department says that in the 2010 filing year more than $4 billion in child credit refunds went to 2.3 million people who filed tax returns but did not have Social Security numbers to prove they were citizens or legal workers. That was a fourfold increase over five years earlier.
Library/Guest Room
A new video posted on the translation’s Facebook further highlights that “The Voice offers an opportunity to hear afresh by telling the stories that have always been in the Bible in a beautiful and poetic way.” It is written in screenplay format “so it’s easy to follow or act out in a group.”
and admiring each setting members have brought to the day.
Eagle Rd & St. Denis Lane, Havertown
I walked today on misty trails
Fermented with McCoy's House Ale Yeast
Each week I create a collage of my pictures from my IPhone. I like to let you know about each picture and try my best to go in order. Starting at the top left and going right........
They may feel comforting and soothing on a cold day but in the end, it will be less soothing and more irritating. The hot water strips away the skin’s natural oils and lipids, allowing for moisture to evaporate from the skin more readily and quickly. It also reduces your skin’s natural defenses when the natural lipid barrier is depleted. The longer the exposure to the heated water, the more this will happen, resulting in dry skin, irritations and more. Opt for shorter showers or baths (10 minutes or less) at a lower temperature (lukewarm to warm is best). If possible, try to bathe or shower only once daily during colder months too.
He sat up slowly. Magali or Benjamin. Tiptoeing down the stairs to the kitchen, wishing there was something to eat. . . . He got out of bed and leaned out the window, watching for the faint light that would come through from the kitchen. No light came.
More good advice to follow as a beginners guide to investing is to get in for the long term. Only certain personalities can become day traders and even most of them fail. Some of the best beginners guide to investing is to stick with your stock. Research your choices and make the best decision you can. Then, do not second-guess yourself. Stick with your choice for a while and see how you do a couple of years down the road.
That’s all for this post ladies and gents.
Cinema 90 - In Ultra Violet
Alcohol in the fuel requires more flow to maintain power needs. In two cycle engines the fuel flow can also relate to lubrication needs. It takes a more open, counter-clockwise adjustment on the screws, to allow enough fuel to run properly. Most carburetors will adjust 10% to 12% but will not accept any higher percentages very well. You should try to a locate a gas supply without ethanol if at all possible.
It is important to understand that everything we are presented with in the corporate-media is manipulated in this fashion, and that everything from the conflict in Syria, to street protests in Thailand, and Putin’s return to power in Russia is presented to us in such a way as to bend our will and predisposition to supporting the agenda of Wall Street and London – not to help us understand the reality of world events as they unfold.
If you are a vintage/second hand shopper, this is the place for you. Huge sections of last season and vintage Chanel, Gucci, Celine, Hermes, Chloe, Jean Paul Gauthier, Marni, you get the idea. There are four different boutiques, one for shoes and accessories, one for clothes, one for jewellry, and a men’s boutique. The selection, especially where Chanel is concerned is out of this world. I spent four hours there and came out with some excellent finds (See Below). They have an amazing balance of show stopping pieces as well as everyday wear pieces, its hard not to find something that will work well for you.
I hope that if you're in a time of busy, busy...go,go,go. That you can just take a minute and slow down, look around your home and Thank the Lord. Thank HIM. Just thank Him.
If all this is true, Paul’s God must be sovereign, all knowing, all-powerful, all controlling. This should have raised their spirits. Besides, what other options did they have? They had laboured tirelessly and unceasingly for two weeks and accomplished nothing. Now there is hope offered if they believe.
Also, I have a little bit of exciting news! Me and some of the other Pink Gem Designs DT girls (Lisa, Mandy and Jenny) were asked to make some cards using a fab set of die cuts and papers that Janet provided as the free cover gift for Creative Cardmaking magazine. The mag came out a few days ago, but I had to wait until I had it in my hands before I could tell you - I needed to actually see my cards in there before I said anything -the paranoid part of me said they might not have been good enough for the mag... I know, I know, Katina don't shout at me lol! Anyway, here's a little look at my first 'appearance' in a mag :o)
I have tried brass-rubbing type techniques, but to no avail. Luckily in good CSI fashion I can still read the imprints of E's engravings, although they cannot actually be seen on the following rather empty looking postcard back. Sorry, E!
According to The Huffington Post, the study notes that not enough training, insecurity over the accuracy of a prognosis, and lack of time may also play a role.
So, when I saw the cake with so many candles that it appears to be falling from the weight, I formulated a plan. I was/am going to make a list and cross off at least one thing each month before turning 40.
Thanks a WindMillion
My career as a personal trainer was another thing that fell into my lap. I joined the gym as my daughter’s workout partner and less than a month later, I became a trainer. Although I no longer work at the gym, I do take some private clients and intend to maintain my certification, at least for the time being. It also keeps me motivated to exercise regularly and eat better, not that I always follow through.
That particular quote for me is everything a few years ago when my life turned upside down , by choice might I add I used this as my motto and still to this day i repeat it to myself when the going gets tough or the belly starts a rumbling !!
I had seven lovely participants in this giveaway, thank you all!
The reaction among those who have been kind enough to let me know how they found the article has so far been very kind – I only (over-optimistically) hope that it will find such a warm reception with all its readers.
In this last week, I was really worried that I had run out of things to write about here at tangobaby. Even reading other blogs and leaving comments seemed like an effort, and that scared me because I love blogging, all aspects of it, and it made me sad to think that all of a sudden, that particular well of pleasure had dried up without warning.
and be with you for all eternity.
We filmed in the school and with our three subjects through the two-week campaign period and the election, and then came back for the first council meeting. We edit collaboratively, from identifying which parts of the interview should make the final script, to cutting scenes and choosing music.
Going into the release, I quickly reread the first book (for the fourth time) so that I could more easily be pedantic and nitpicky about how they adapted the film, what they chose to play up or omit, and how well it worked as a representation of the overall feel and main themes of the book. Most of the time this kind of thing leads to fannish and annoying pointing out of differences as if trying to show off what a smart, super-fan one is, but I’m going to try to stick to things that actually make a difference in overall tone.
During the meeting, five key challenges facing agroforestry in Indonesia were also identified. The first challenge mentioned was the Government’s partial approach to research, which translates into low adoption of research recommendations.
The present set of arguments, that will now be deployed against the “absent qualia” arguments that purport to show that there is a metaphysical problem about phenomenal properties, can all be attributed to some combination of Hume, Wittgenstein and/or Buddhism. The first two arguments are “soft”: they start with two respective points about the nature of language and conclude that private qualitative experience, whatever its ultimate ontological status may be, cannot be the subject of language. This is a soft conclusion because it sets aside the question of whether there really is anything that can coherently be regarded as “inner,” private experience. The remaining arguments are “hard”: they start with the inseparability of mind, experience and world and conclude that it is incoherent to posit the existence of phenomenal properties if these are taken to be mental properties distinct from the physical properties of the experienced world. However although the first two arguments are soft they do, if persuasive, suffice for the naturalization of psychology, because they demonstrate that qualitative experience, whatever that may be, could never have been a subject for natural science, and so is not a problem for natural science.
Who is bringing them here?
- NASA: About 1,000 asteroids big enough to cause catastrophic damage if they hit Earth are orbiting relatively nearby. Reuters
John Henry
A diverse mix of hard rock, blues, punk, and psych, all with a semi-garage flavor, and fairly non-commercial orientation. Grades - 1 A, 2 B's, 3 B-'s, and a C. This issue is anumbered micro-press of 350 copies.
I haven't used this yet, but I did open it up to take a good whiff..lol It smells JUST like a yummy Chocolate Cupcake! It arrived in mint condition and I can't wait to try it out! The frosting on top looks so real!
Check back in a few days for a project from some brand new, just released JustRite stamps!
midnight. Can you come back then?” Raven shifted on his perch, turning his head
(Here he is with some of his wacky musician friends after a Christmas 2010 concert at a local church.)
Wednesday, I came down with an infection. Nothing serious -- two days in bed later, I was fit as a fiddle and fine as frog's hair. But I was also on the ground, in Philadelphia. While the airplane I was not in was on its way to China.
Two years ago a woman came to the shelter to bring two puppies (Timon and Gastao): she was going on holidays and asked to keep them for a few weeks. A weeks later she came with their older brother (so she said), Sebastiao. She was soon going on holidays and it would be only for a few weeks.
Earth has one natural satellite orbiting it every 28 days or so. It is called Moon. I know, not a very imaginative name for a… moon. Personally, I would rather refer to it as Luna or Selene. Every other moon in the solar system has a proper name. Mars, for example, has two moons and are called Phobos and Deimos. Jupiter has 66, as far as we can tell. Again, we are in no position to compete with those giants in case we become too vain about our puny planet.
I also found a lot of new blogs to follow myself. I have a wide variety of interests and joining this challenge allowed me to find them!
Unable to scare everyone with the global warming hoax, new horrors are being invented, from ocean acidification to the claim that the atmosphere is being overloaded with nitrogen. Relax, there’s four times more nitrogen in the atmosphere than oxygen and it’s no big deal.
and some things leave me smiling...
They have shows coming up in October in Nevada, Colorado, New Mexico, Kansas, Alabama, Texas, Illinois, Iowa, and West Virginia. Maybe you, too, can catch the awesomeness with a side of odd. For more info, click here.
This morning i thought that it was illegal to fire me the way that my boss do. So I phoned an old friend of mine. He's a lawyer, and he's out of luck, like me, he has no job, his lawyers office went bankrupt and had to close, he doesn't find job in any other, and nobody ask him for help with legal issues.
The Muslim population at London Met stands at approximately 20 per cent, so assuming all Muslims at the campus were in favour of the ban, this could not be imposed as it would go against the fundamental principal of democracy.” They go on to say:
What then of our involvement at other levels? If we decide that as Christian doctors we should not participate in the ‘shedding of innocent blood’, then surely this must have implications for other levels of involvement. If we 'participate' by filling out forms authorising abortions, preparing patients for the procedure or referring to others whom we know will do the same aren't we giving tacit approval to the whole process?
Just over 170 pages long, a cover page with some funny cartoons and an interesting title, which reminds the reader of a recent red coloured cover page book by a notoriously popular writer!!! I picked up Two Fates at the airport yesterday when my flight I was to travel was delayed by two hours.
Last year I had a lovely day with my friend M____ in the City shopping for yarn. As we walked into one store, I spotted a lovely scarf that was just crocheted squares joined together. At first glance they were Granny Squares, but on closer inspection they were a little different than the usual Granny Square. I could have bought the pattern, or made a sketch & figured it out myself, but I came to the conclusion that any motif would work. So home I came, & ventured through all my Mum's crochet magazines (that I now have) looking for an appropriate motif pattern. I found heaps in my search, including one triangular one which I thought could prove interesting & different. In the end it was too big, so I modified it down to what you see above.
Science tells us
Leather and lace, darks and lights, femininity and androgyny .
2. Using the same method from step 2 on felt flower (purple), make the flower.
Tomorrow is a 3 mile run, which I am looking forward to, as long as it makes my back pain go away like it has done in the past.
I believe we are on a countdown to the last days of life as we know it. I don't necessarily believe that the world is ending in 2012. I, also, don't believe in the whole global warming thing. But, there is something inside me that has been building for the last few years and this year it feels almost like a desperation. I can't stay who I was. I have to change. I have to help others. Kind of like a "no man left behind" scenario. There are so many hurting people and it just keeps getting worse. This world's depravity is getting worse instead of better. Too many people worrying about lining their pockets and less about helping those in need. Do not get me wrong. I do not support the Occupiers. Their behavior is foolish. I believe in an America that is free to succeed. I am sad that people have gotten so jealous of the success of others that they feel the need to tear them down to their level. This is so "Atlas Shrugged" it's not even funny. I just wish I was one of the tycoons that could shut down their business and go live in the secret valley with John Gault. However, I am not called to that. I am called to help people, not to hand them what they want and need, but help them help themselves. I am called to grow people and encourage people and help people succeed.
And not like onscreen lovers. Then it would matter;
The fat little man told them all about Humpty-Dumpty, who tumbled downstairs, yet ascended the throne and married the Princess. And the children clapped and shouted, "Tell us another one! Tell us another one!" For they wanted to hear about Ivedy-Avedy too, but after Humpty-Dumpty the story telling stopped. The fir tree stood very still as it pondered how the birds in the woods had never told it a story to equal this.
DC: Penial excoriatment or excisement
KBTFM Blog (kbtfmblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Wednesday, 15. October
What would you do if you knew you couldn’t fail?
If you think the new air force jets are a bad buy for the buck then you are dumping on the military. How dare you.
The officer returned to his microphone and said, “Ten-one-zero-eight.”
Your ability to build deep, long-lasting relationships is the key ingredient to success in your business.
Children spinning around till they fall down down down.
"Do you have a preference for white guys and what do you think about Taiwanese guys who aggressively refuses to be with a Taiwanese guy in any way?"
On top of that i checked my ebay account to find the items i am selling has gone up to £93 with still 3 days to go on it so hopefully theres a little bit of money coming my way. Searched through ebay typing in random words and you do have to questions some people mentality with what they will actualy try to sell.
A GREASY THUG (20’S)
Be well fellas!
To the one crafting reality’s details
Whew, now...am I crazy or what!?! ;)
I moved my fist up and down, spreading the natural lube along my shaft to make my fingers slide easily, sending sparks along the length.
The color challenge is Not Quite Navy, Pool Party and Certainly Celery, a pretty color combo.
If you haven't already joined the ranks of online shoppers, do yourself a favor and try going the online shopping/gift basket route. I guarantee you'll enjoy the holiday season a whole lot more!
Here is the list of the stamps I used:
Thanks so much for your visit today. I really enjoyed making this card for you; hope you like it!
3. What is your current favorite workout?
pulling fist fulls of rotten wood from my heart, I still believe in saviors
(Razorlight - who needs love?)
We can be attempting to be another instrument not the one God intended us to be causing our sound to be confused and muddled.
After witnessing the TARDIS being stolen, The Doctor and Jamie must track down an elusive Victorian antiques dealer, rescue an abducted girl in 1866, and unlock they key to the Human Factor, unaware that they are caught up in an intricate web woven by The Emperor Dalek.
In 2008/09, 13.5 million people, 22% of the population in the UK were living in households below the 60% threshold. That is a fuck of a lot of people and these are official figures used by the government for poverty in the UK, don't forget. So why hasn't there been a revolution?
Eva and the twins, Erik and Hans. Hans has a sweet helmet to help with a flat spot on his head.
Stir it all up and bring to a low boil. Reduce heat and simmer for 10 minutes or until it's thick enough for you.
Let's start with the ones I got through email.
Occupy Wall Street doesn’t need to jettison mass appeal to achieve genuine economic reform. In a democratic policy, one that takes votes on a majoritarian basis, a strong coalition can be forged from the 80% of Americans who genuinely have seen no advances in the last decade. But it will have to declare where it stands.
This is the first visualization I saw of this, from Margaret Mooney. Fisher and Frey are also strongly associated with this idea, and their Google book preview is extensive. I was introduced to this by Dave Coffey (of course) and he has a very nice explanation on his blog. Rather than repeat what he wrote, I'll share what it means to me. Sometimes it's a framework for a single class period, sometimes for an entire course, depending on the scope of the objective.
1/2 c. chopped nuts
I picked up a bag each of fried potato balls and banana chips (both for $5 total) - but rice crisps also seemed to be popular.
Paul Dyke has plenty to say at half-time. Dave Williams who is watching, condenses his description of the first-half to one word - gash. We sit on the wet grass, drinking tap water, as Dyke dissects our performance. He has no qualms betraying a confidence in order to get his point across to team captain, Martyn Barnett; who he thinks is having a quiet game. "It's no good texting me saying: skip's up for it today," says Dyke, "I want to see a captain's performance." By this point, Kristian Hewitt is sniggering. That Martyn had been texting his manager, not only in the third person, but in a shortened version of his new title, was the green light for what will surely be a prolonged spell of teasing.
MISEREATUR AND INDULGENTIAM
I love fairy tales, and folklore, and books that make me wonder if the world is really as it seems. I love writing about doors, and places between, and the cracks where reality slips into something darker, stranger, and invariably more interesting.
A dress from ‘There’s No Business Like Showbusiness‘ in the scene where she manipulates the male lead in to letting her perform her ‘Heatwave’ song number. This is not a well known dress but we thought it was lovely and would translate really well in to rubber and hope you agree with us. It is cut high on the front neck with a back to front collar opening on to a very low cut back. A strap connects the front and back arm holes and has a cute bow on it. The original dress had button closures on the back but I decided to go for zip closure instead. We sometimes use button closures in our latex designs but only if the design really gains from it. Zip closures on latex are much easier to get in and out of.
Catherine and Ashley are in the bottom two. Oh no! I’m not ready to say bye to the silly Scottish accent that pronounced photo phoO, but I know it’s coming. Yep, and we say good-bye to Ashley.
So what's in your makebelieve Easter basket??? Do tell!
More and more the values of brands will spread not through mass media but through the networks of humans talking to each other.
with the would-be self of their dreams. Hinamori Amu, part of a group called the Guardians, protect those eggs from becoming x-eggs, eggs filled with resentment and resignation that gives children troubles. Amu's job is to capture and restore x-eggs to their orginal form. She does this with the help of her three Shugo Chara (guardian characters or her would be selves), Ran, Miki and Su. Thanks to them she can change her character and abilities, and so fight against the mysterious organization Easter which aim is to find a special egg called Embryo
11.) I Am Stronger On Foreign Affairs - NOT EXACTLY, except for Africa
(My dad’s side is even bigger) Typical Asian family.
As Fate would have it, I broke my leg a year or two later. Not skiing, just skateboarding. Well, not even skateboarding but rather attempting to skateboard. It was 1977 and I was hanging out with some lads who had embraced the new craze from America with fervour. I was determined I was going to be the coolest skateboarding chick on the block. It didn’t last long. First run down our steep drive and I decide I didn’t fancy hurtling over the pavement into the road. I put my trainer-clad foot down on the tarmac. It sticks like glue while the one on the board hurtles on. I twist and fall; it snaps and dislocates at the ankle. Painful. Very. And no anaesthetic for hours because I’d just eaten breakfast. The discomfort and inconvenience of the next three months in a full leg plaster was not something I was rushing to repeat, so I had my perfect excuse not to ski. I left it to my brother and father for the next couple of years.
And then there’s the surname – very rare in Spain – my roots. Seen Bellis or Bellos and had a few ‘Belle Arse’ comments at school. Maybe more of the ‘Bellend’ ones. But overall, rare.
3. Joseph isn’t as into yoga as I am, but he will attend a few classes with me. He is open to venturing into other styles of yoga, and we’re both very open to attending a retreat. Would you please describe what a day would be like at your retreat, and what are some benefits that should be expected once someone completes the duration at your retreat?
When Valentina comes back to life Gnaghi is waiting for her. He frees her head from the coffin and she lets him kiss her. Gnaghi keeps her head inside his broken TV set. Mayor Scanarotti has come to the cemetery with the really pathetic idea of being photographed beside his dead daughter to help him with his election campaign. He’s not very happy when Francesco digs up her body and her head is missing. Then he hears her calling to him and goes into Gnaghi’s room and sees her in the broken TV. Valentina tells he father that she intends to marry Gnaghi and when he objects she flies out of the TV set and bites him on the neck killing him. Francesco then has to put a bullet in her head. Gnaghi is heartbroken but Francesco points out that she was rotting anyway and he needs to find a living woman.
and i'm fairly certain
The first scenario might be two people bantering back and forth prior to a personal conflict, such as the interchange between David and Goliath in 1 Sam. 17:41-47. A second is the same kind of bantering, only larger in scale, such as one army or its respective leader provoking or threatening another. For example, Ben-hadad II taunted Ahab during the siege of Samaria (1 Kgs. 20:2-9), and Sennacherib verbally provoked Hezekiah during the siege of Jerusalem (2 Kgs. 18:19-28). Regardless of the size of the opposing forces, the purpose of this kind of dialogue is twofold. First, it served to encourage and motivate the speaker; and second, to discourage and demoralize the recipient. Willis sees in Ps. 2, (1) a “…threat of impending conflict…(vv. 1-3), (2) …affirmations of certainty by the speaker that he (and his comrades) will prevail (vv. 4, 6, 8-9); and (3) warnings to the enemy that they will be defeated if they do not surrender…”[2] It may well be that Ps. 2 was read during the coronation of the Davidic King; or more likely, that it was integral to a cult ritual and read on an annual basis; but the historic scenario wherein Yahweh established his regent in the midst of turmoil with an assurance of victory will be crucial to understanding later interpretations of Ps. 2.
Format version: Version 2
i'm odd.
